Tracking trends and analyzing new and reemerging infectious disease issues around the world Apeer-reviewed journal published by the National Center for Infectious Diseases Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAug 1999 Biological Warfare Dengue Reemergence Cryptospordium Disinfection DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES CDC CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION Volume 5, Number 4 JulyAugust 1999 National Symposium on Medical and Public Health Response to Bioterrorism About the First National Symposium on Medical and Public Health Response to Bioterrorism ......................................................
491 Cover: John Singer Sargent.
Gassed (1919).
Reprinted with permission of the Imperial War Museum, London.
D.A. Henderson Bioterrorism: How Prepared Are We? ...........................................................
492 The Emerging Threat of Bioterrorism .........
494 D.E. Shalala J.M. Hughes S.A. McCann Letters Current Status of Smallpox Vaccine ...........
593 J.W. LeDuc and J. Becher View from the Hill: Congressional Efforts to Address Bioterrorism ....................
496 Finding the Right Balance against Bioterrorism ...................................................
497 Historical Trends Related to Bioterrorism: An Empirical Analysis ...................................
498 The Threat of Biological Attack: Why Concern Now? ................................................
505 Nuclear Blindness: An Overview of the Biological Weapons Programs of the Former Soviet Union and Iraq ......................
509 Aum Shinrikyo: Once and Future Threat? ............................................................
513 The Prospect of Domestic Bioterrorism ........
517 Potential Biological Weapons Threats ..........
523 Epidemiology of Bioterrorism .......................
528 Vaccines in Civilian Defense Against Bioterrorism ...................................................
531 Vaccines, Pharmaceutical Products, and Bioterrorism: Challenges for the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ............
534 R.A. Clarke West Nile Fever in Czechland ........................
594 Z. Hub�lek, J. Halouzka, and Z. Juricov� J.B. Tucker D.W. Siegrist Ofloxacin-Resistant Vibrio cholerae O139 in Hong Kong ..................
595 K.-M. Kam, K.-Y.
Luey, T.-L. Cheung, K.-Y.
Ho, K.-H. Mak, and P. Thian Aun Saw C.J. Davis K.B. Olson Plant Pathology and Public Health ..................
597 K.-B. G. Scholthof J. Stern M.G. Kortepeter and G.W. Parker J.A. Pavlin P.K. Russell Pet-Associated Zoonoses ..........................
598 L.L. Barton, R. G. Villar, and M. Connick The opinions expressed by authors contributing to this journal do not necessarily reflect the opinions of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention or the institutions with which the authors are affiliated.
K.C. Zoon Volume 5, Number 4 JulyAugust 1999 Dispatches Cytotoxin-Producing Escherichia coli O157 in Wales, 1990 to 1998 .........
566 R.M. Chalmers, S.M. Parry, R.L. Salmon, R.M.M.
Smith, G.A. Willshaw, and T. Cheasty Bioterrorism Symposium cont'd.
Smallpox: Clinical and Epidemiologic Features .......................................................
537 Smallpox: An Attack Scenario ...................
540 Aftermath of a Hypothetical Smallpox Disaster .......................................................
547 Clinical and Epidemiologic Principles of Anthrax ....................................................
552 Anthrax: A Possible Case History ..............
556 Applying Lessons Learned from Anthrax Case History to Other Scenarios ................
561 Addressing Bioterrorist Threats: Where Do We Go From Here? ................................
564 D.A. Henderson T. O'Toole J. Bardi A Focus of Deer Tick Virus Transmission in the Northcentral United States ...................
570 G.D. Ebel, I. Foppa, A. Spielman, and S.R. Telford, III T.J. Cieslak and E.M. Eitzen, Jr.
T.V. Inglesby J.G. Bartlett Dengue Reemergence in Argentina .....................
575 G. Avil�s, G. Range�n, V. Vorndam, A. Briones, P. Baroni, D. Enria, and M.S. Sabattini M.A. Hamburg Chlorine Disinfection of Recreational Water for Cryptosporidium parvum .............................
579 C. Carpenter, R. Fayer, J. Trout, and M.J. Beach Commentary Addressing the Potential Threat of Bioterrorism: Value Added To an Improved Public Health Infrastructure ............................................
591 J.E. McDade Cyclospora cayetanensis Among Expatriate and Indigenous Populations of West Java, Indonesia ................
585 D.J. Fryauff Book Review Clinical Infectious Diseases: A Practical Approach ......................................
599 J.M. Miller News and Notes The Epidemiology and Control of Communicable Diseases ....................................
Antibiotic Resistance in Bacteria of Animal Origin .....................................................
Keystone Symposia on Molecular and Cellular Biology ..................................................
The 5th World Congress on Trauma, Shock, Inflammation and SepsisPathophysiology, Immune Consequences and Therapy ...............................
International Conference on Emerging Infectious Diseases .............................................
601 601 601 The First Major Outbreak of Dengue Hemorrhagic Fever in Delhi, India ......................
589 L. Dar, S. Broor, S. Sengupta, I. Xess, and P. Seth 601 602 Pr eface About the First National Symposium on Medical and Public Health Response to Bioterrorism D.A. Henderson Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies On February 16-17, 1999, in Arlington, Virginia, 950 public health officials, physicians, and other medical personnel, along with government, military, and intelligence experts gathered for the first National Symposium on Medical and Public Health Response to Bioterrorism.
Participants were geographically diverse.
Represented were 46 states, plus Washington, D.C., and 10 countries: Australia, Austria, Canada, England, Finland, France, Germany, Israel, Italy, and the Netherlands.
The guiding force behind the symposium was the newly established Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies, which hopes the discussions will lead to a framework and partnership for strategic planning.
The other main sponsors were the Department of Health and Human Services, Infectious Diseases Society of America, and American Society for Microbiology.
Twelve other public health professional societies supported the conference.1 The list of speakers included D.A. Henderson, director of the Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies; Christopher J. Davis, former senior intelligence analyst for chemical and biological warfare matters on Britains Defense Intelligence staff; Jessica Stern, Council on Foreign Relations and author of the book The Ultimate Terrorists; Joshua Lederberg, Nobel laureate and professor and president emeritus of Rockefeller University; Col. Gerald W. Parker, director of the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases; Thomas V. Inglesby and Tara OToole, Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies; and Philip K. Russell, Johns Hopkins School of Public Health.
Federal, state, and local officials reflected on the challenge of coordinating a multidisciplinary and interagency response to a biological attack.
This array of speakers included Secretary of Health and Human Services Donna Shalala; Richard Clarke, National Security Council; Michael Osterholm, Minnesota Department of Health; and Jerry Hauer, director of New York Citys Office of Emergency Management.
From their different backgrounds and perspectives, the more than 20 speakers addressed the following questions: Why are current concerns about bioterrorism real? Why must the medical and public health communities address the issue of bioterrorism? Which biological threats warrant the most concern? What is the possible aftermath of an act of biological terrorism? A warning against complacency came from the symposiums closing speaker, Margaret A. Hamburg, assistant secretary for planning and evaluation, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.
In making symposium presentations available here, the organizers hope to raise awareness of the medical and public health threats posed by biological weapons and to foster mutual understanding and collaboration among the diverse groups addressing the threat of bioterrorism.
1American College of Preventive Medicine, Association for Professionals in Infection Control and Epidemiology, Association of Public Health Laboratories, Association of Schools of Public Health, Association of State and Territorial Health Officials, Commissioned Officers Association of the U.S.
Public Health Service, Council of State and Territorial Epidemiologists, National Association of County and City Health Officials, National Association of Local Boards of Health, Partnership for Prevention, Public Health Foundation, and Society of Hospital Epidemiologists of America.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 491 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Bioterrorism: How Prepared Are We? Donna E. Shalala U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services Richard Prestons The Cobra Event, which he dedicates to public health professionals, weaves a chilling, but compelling tale about a lone terrorists attack on Manhattan with a genetically engineered virus.
Prestons thoughtprovoking novel raises a logical question: How do we successfully contain and combat the threat of bioterrorism? To meet this emerging threat, we must address four important challenges.
The first challenge is to be aware that an act of bioterrorism could happen.
Its likelihood is entirely unknown, and an attack may never occur.
However, we have seen terrorism emerge as one of the thorniest problems of the post-cold war era, and we have seen that terrorists are always searching for new weapons.
We have already seen sarin nerve gas released in the Tokyo subway.
Somewhere, sometime in the future, terrorists may well threaten to use, or attempt to use, a biological weapon against the United States.
When discussing the possibility of a terrorist attack in the next few years, the president unequivocally stated, This is not a cause for panic.
It is cause for serious, deliberate, disciplined, long-term concern.
In other words, we must not be afraid, but we must be aware.
Once we are fully aware that bioterrorism could happen, our second challenge is to be prepared.
That is why the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) is spending $158 million this fiscal year to prepare for bioterorrism and why the president has proposed increasing that investment by an additional $72 million in his Fiscal Year 2000 budget.
This investment will fund our ongoing AntiBioterrorism Initiative.
To increase our level of preparedness, the initiative is expanding its activities in a number of key areas: surveillance, medical and public health response, building a stockpile of drugs and supplies, and research and development.
We are improving and strengthening the U.S. public health surveillance network by enhancing our capability to detect and report outbreaks, conduct epidemiologic investigations, perform laboratory tests to identify biological agents, and communicate necessary information and advisories rapidly through electronic technology.
We are enhancing our medical and public health response capacity by spearheading an administrationwide effort to develop infrastructure at the local level by establishing in major American cities medical response teams to deal with the consequences of bioterrorism.
We are also expanding our capacity to provide prophylaxis, medical care, and infection control on a massive scale.
We are creating, and will be maintaining, an unprecedented national stockpile of drugs and vaccines for civilian use in case of a bioterrorist attack.
Finally, we are accelerating our research and development of rapid diagnostics, drugs, and vaccines, so we can more effectively address the threats and consequences of a bioterrorist attack.
In addition, we will continue our work on the genome sequencing of organisms most likely to be used as bioweapons, so that we can not only quickly identify the biological agent, but also develop effective therapies.
Our efforts in surveillance, medical and public health response, stockpile provision, and research and development will increase significantly our preparedness for bioterrorism.
If we want to be truly prepared, our third challenge is for the public health and medical communities to take the lead in our fight against bioterrorism.
In a conventional terrorist attack, local first responders, such as the police, firefighters, and paramedics, constitute the first line of defense.
With bioterrorism, the public health and medical communities stand directly on the front lines.
How well we respond to a threat or attack will depend on the preparedness of our public health and medical communities.
For example, if a bioterrorist threat is issued perhaps someone claims to have released a Emerging Infectious Diseases 492 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue deadly pathogen in a public placephysicians must be able to recognize and report cases that come to attention in emergency rooms and doctors offices; public health officials must be able to conduct investigations to establish the likely site/time of exposure, the size and location of the exposed population, and the prospects for secondary transmission; and appropriately traned laboratory personnel must be available to identify the biological agent.
Whether the release of a bioweapon is announced or surreptitious, affected persons may not have symptoms for days or even weeks, and by then they would be geographically dispersed.
Quarantine is not practical because only one biological agentsmallpoxis communicable.
Even with smallpox, it would be impossible to know whom to quarantine because of the spread of disease by secondary transmission and the difficulty in accurately identifying those who have been exposed.
A strong electronic communications network would be needed to piece together early reports, as well as epidemiologic and laboratory data, to determine what had happened so that public health and law enforcement officials can take prompt action.
The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention would play an important role in this process because of its particular expertise in surveillance, infectious disease, and public health.
Everyonefrom the physicians who first see victims to the scientists who identify the infectious agentsmust coordinate their efforts.
That brings me to the fourth, and final, challenge: We must all work together.
In the fight against bioterrorism, the federal government, particularly HHS, has a leadership role.
Among other things, we need to support state and local planning efforts, provide training at every level, develop an infrastructure for delivering mass medical care, and offer expertise to our communities.
This is a fight we certainly cannot win by ourselves.
Across the board, we must forge new working partnerships among health, public safety, and intelligence agencies.
We need unprecedented cooperation among the federal government, state and local health agencies, and the medical community.
We must ensure that plans for managing the medical consequences of terrorist acts are well integrated and coordinated with other emergency response systems.
Close collaborative efforts are necessary also because microbes do not respect boundaries of culture, language, or territory.
An act of bioterrorism cannot be contained by any national border or barrier.
When it comes to microbes, we are not protected, in the words of the Indian poet Tagore, by narrow domestic walls.
Since these organisms recognize no boundaries, in our battle against them, neither can we.
Because we share a common future, we must share a common resolve.
As Dr. Gro Bruntland, the directorgeneral of the World Health Organization, has said, when it comes to public health and safety, Solutions, like the problems, have to be global...
As we work together to counter bioterrorism, we must pool our will and our resources to meet the challenges.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 493 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue The Emerging Threat of Bioterrorism James M. Hughes Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, Atlanta, Georgia, USA The threat of bioterrorism focuses attention on overall preparedness to address the challenges posed by new and reemerging infectious diseases.
Bioterrorism scenarios illustrate the diversity of disciplines and perspectives required to confront these threats, whether naturally occurring or purposely caused.
The need to strengthen existing and develop new partnerships is clear.
Since late 1992, a number of large, complex outbreaks have occurred in the United States.
These include the epidemic of over 400,000 cases of waterborne cryptosporidiosis in Milwaukee, the outbreak of severe, unexplained acute respiratory disease now known as hantavirus pulmonary syndrome in the Spring of 1993, the nationwide foodborne salmonellosis outbreak caused by contaminated ice cream that accounted for an estimated 250,000 cases in the fall of 1994, and the increasing problems posed by antimicrobial-resistant organisms in community and health-care settings.
Epidemics of plague in India, Ebola hemorrhagic fever in Central Africa, avian (H5N1) influenza in Hong Kong, Hendra virus infection in Australia, and Nipah virus infection recently in Malaysia and Singapore required an international response.
During the hantavirus, plague, and Ebola investigations, concerns regarding the possibility of bioterrorism were raised early in the investigations, though these concerns were not supported by subsequent findings.
Investigating these outbreaks in collaboration with local, national, and international partners has provided a number of important lessons, which are reinforced by the threat of bioterrorism.
We must avoid complacency and stress preparedness through careful planning and testing of emergency response plans.
There is a critical need to strengthen surveillance systems and epidemiologic and laboratory Address for correspondence: James M. Hughes, National Center for Infectious Diseases, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, 1600 Clifton Rd NE, Mail Stop C12, Atlanta, GA 30333, USA; fax: 404-639-3039; e-mail: jmh2@cdc.gov. capacity in clinical and public health settings.
The outbreaks have illustrated disruptions of travel and commerce and potential threats to national security.
The complications of naturally occurring, complex epidemics underline the global implications of local problems.
These lessons are directly relevant to the threat of bioterrorism.
The challenges of recognizing disease resulting from the clandestine release of an infectious agent are considerable, given the potential for geographic dispersion of the agent (through travel) during the incubation period.
The public health approach to bioterrorism must begin with the development of local and state plans formulated collaboratively by the public health, emergency response, and law enforcement communities, which must work together closely in this phase if an epidemic is to be detected in a timely manner, which is critical to its appropriate management.
Local health departments and health-care workers will be on the front lines in detection and response.
Infection control practitioners, emergency department personnel, microbiologists, first responders, emergency management personnel, and local, state, and federal law enforcement personnel will play vital roles and must engage with each other during the planning stage.
Close collaboration between the clinical and public health communities will also be critical.
From a public health perspective, timely surveillance, clinician awareness of syndromes potentially resulting from bioterrorism, epidemiologic investigation capacity, laboratory diagnostic capacity in both clinical and public health laboratory settings, and the ability to rapidly communicate critical information at the local level to those who have a need to know and to manage public communication through the media will be vital.
In addition, ensuring the timely availability of an adequate supply of antimicrobial drugs, antitoxins, and vaccines is a formidable challenge.
Deployment and administration of stockpiled components to those affected or at greatest risk are also critical.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 494 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Recognition of the need for local, regional, and national preparedness for bioterrorism provides an opportunity to strengthen the public health system and its linkages with current and new partners.
As President Bill Clinton said in his address at the National Academy of Sciences in January 1998, These cutting edge efforts will address not only the threat of weapons of mass destruction, but also the equally serious danger of emerging infectious diseases.
So we will benefit even if we are successful in avoiding these attacks(1).
References 1.
Clinton WJ. Remarks by the President on keeping America secure for the 21st Century.
National Academy of Sciences, Washington, D.C., January 22, 1999.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 495 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue View from the Hill: Congressional Efforts to Address Bioterrorism S. Anthony McCann U.S. House of Representatives, Washington, D.C., USA In governmentand particularly in the federal governmentideas normally come from the bottom up.
When finally approved, proposals are reasonably well thought out in terms of what we are going to do and why we are going to do it.
Sometimes knowledge of what we are going to do far exceeds the ability to explain why we are going to do it.
However, for bioterrorism we are better able to talk about the why than the what.
When Congress received a request from the administration to address bioterrorism, we had only the vaguest idea what they wanted to do.
As a result, the availability of funds was delayed until an operating plan was in place.
We are still fleshing out exactly how to approach this problem, what the roles of the various agencies are, and what the legal issues are.
It is incumbent upon the community to spend more time studying the proposal and coming back to Congress with more detail.
As the scientific community examines the issues involved in bioterrorism, an education campaign should be undertaken to inform the public and the members of Congress at the local and national levels.
Many people equate bioterrorism with chemical or explosive accidents that are obvious and identifiable.
The insidious nature of bioterrorist attacks should be better explored and communicated.
Finally, over the last 20 or 25 years, efforts to bring about structural reform in state and local governments and in local public health departments have eroded.
Efforts by Congress to fund the bioterrorism initiative may have a dual effect: they may not only improve our ability to respond to a bioterrorist incident but also may strengthen state and local health departments.
S. Anthony McCann is Staff Director for the House Appropriations Subcommittee handling the budgets for the Departments of Labor, Health and Human Services, and Education.
In this capacity, Mr. McCann provides support and makes policy recommendations to the Chairman and majority members for over $70 billion in discretionary programs under the subcommittees jurisdiction.
Mr. McCann also served under the Bush Administration as Assistant Secretary for Finance and IRM and Chief Financial Officer of the Department of Veterans Affairs.
Address for correspondence: S. Anthony McCann, U.S. House of Representatives, Appropriations Committee, Subcommittee on Labor, Health and Human Services, Education, and Related Agencies, 2358 Rayburn House Office Building, Washington, D.C. 20515-6024, USA; fax: 202-225-3509.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 496 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Finding the Right Balance against Bioterrorism Richard A. Clarke The White House, Washington, D.C., USA For the first time the Deparment of Health and Human Services is part of the national security apparatus of the United States.
That reflects a change in our views on chemical and biological defense programs.
Almost 5 years ago at the bidding of the president we began to look at what has come to be known as asymmetrical threats, ways in which opponents (be they nations or terrorist groups) could attack us without directly engaging our military forces.
At the same time we were faced with two events that drew our attention to chemical and biological threats.
Iraq used chemical weapons on Iran and on its own citizens and appeared to be concealing a biological weapons program.
Also, the hitherto unknown Japanese cult Aum Shinrikyo used sarin nerve agent in the Tokyo subway; the cult failed in an attempt to use biological weapons against Americans in Japan.
In 1998, the president launched the first national effort to create a biological weapons defense for the United States.
While some believe that the response is not strong enough, many others think that the proposed program exaggerates the threat, that biological weapons are too unpredictable, and that the only big biological weapons program died with the Soviet Union.
However, the former Soviet Union was not the only state engaged in biological weapons research and development.
Almost every nation on the State Departments list of nations that sponsor terrorism has engaged in chemical and or biological weapons development.
If these nations have armed, trained, funded, and advised terrorist groups, they could cross the line and provide terrorists with chemical or biological weapons.
Finally, some critics say that until we really know about a specific threat to use these weapons against the United States, we should not be raising the specter of horror; instead we should be quietly working in Geneva to improve the ban on biological weapons.
We are pushing in Geneva, but that is not enough.
When we learn of a specific threat, it will be too late to do research and development, too late to procure medicines, too late to train local authorities.
The current bioterrorism initiative includes a new concept: the first-ever procurement of specialized medicines for a national civilian protection stockpile.
As new vaccines and medicines are developed, that program can be expanded.
The initiative includes invigoration of research and development in the science of biodefense; it invests in pathogen genome sequencing, new vaccine research, new therapeutics research, and development of improved detection and diagnostic systems.
The 2-year program provides for Department of Health and Human Services research, almost tripling the previous 2-year effort, in addition to ongoing work in the Defense Department, and it includes a reinitiation of the federal program to help state and local public health infrastructure and surveillance systems.
The biological weapons protection program is part of the overall chemical and biological protection effort, which includes aid to state and local governments for first-responder training, planning, exercises, and equipment.
Richard A. Clarke serves as the countrys first National Coordinator for Security, Infrastructure Protection and Counter-Terrorism.
He was Deputy Assistant Secretary of State for Intelligence in the Reagan Administration and served in the Bush Administration as Assistant Secretary of State for Politico-Military Affairs.
Address for correspondence: Richard A. Clarke, National Security Council, 17th and Pennsylvania Avenue, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20504; fax: 202-456-9360.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 497 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Historical Trends Related to Bioterrorism: An Empirical Analysis Jonathan B. Tucker Monterey Institute of International Studies, Monterey, California, USA
Since the Japanese doomsday cult Aum Shinrikyo released sarin nerve gas on the Tokyo subway in March 1995, killing 12 people, terrorist incidents and hoaxes involving toxic or infectious agents have been on the rise.
Before the late 1990s, the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) typically investigated a dozen cases per year involving the acquisition or use of chemical, biological, radiologic, or nuclear materials; however, FBI opened 74 such investigations in 1997 and 181 in 1998 (1).
Although 80% of these incidents have been hoaxes, some were unsuccessful attacks (2).
The vulnerability of civilian populations to chemical, biological, radiologic, or nuclear terrorism has been widely discussed, but information on historical cases is anecdotal and often inaccurate (3).
Without a realistic threat assessment based on solid empirical data, government policymakers lack the knowledge they need to design prudent and cost-effective programs for preventing or mitigating future incidents.
Responding to this knowledge gap, the Chemical and Biological Weapons Nonproliferation Project at the Monterey Institutes Center for Nonproliferation Studies has compiled an open-source database of all publicly known cases from 1900 to the present in which domestic or international criminals or terrorists sought to acquire or use chemical, biological, radiologic, or nuclear materials.
As of January 31, 1999, the database contained 415 incidents, both domestic and international.
Each entry draws on multiple sources and includes a detailed description of the event and a list of citations.
The project has conducted a preliminary analysis of the data to discern patterns over time Address for correspondence: Jonathan B. Tucker, Chemical and Biological Weapons Nonproliferation Project, Center for Nonproliferation Studies, Monterey Institute of International Studies, 425 Van Buren Street, Monterey, CA 93940, USA; fax: 831-647-6534; e-mail: jtucker@miis.edu. in the frequency of such incidents, the underlying motives, and the choice of agent and target.
The ultimate goal is to identify which types of individuals or groups are most likely to acquire and use toxic or infectious materials and for what purposes.
Since the Monterey Database has been compiled from journalistic accounts and other unclassified sources, it may not be comprehensive or fully accurate.
Incidents have been recorded only if they came to the attention of law enforcement or the news media, so the database does not include events that were not detected or whose existence remains secret.
Despite these limitations, the information in the database indicates trends and patterns of behavior that may assist intelligence and law-enforcement personnel in focusing their monitoring efforts.
Database Findings Most of the incidents in the Monterey Database involve chemical or biological agents rather than radiologic or nuclear materials (Figure 1).
The cases have been divided into three categories: terrorist events, criminal events, and state-sponsored assassinations.
To be classified as a terrorist event, an incident must involve an organization or person that conspires to use violence instrumentally to Figure 1.
Overall database: Distribution of incident by type, 1960Jan.
31, 1999 (415 cases).
Emerging Infectious Diseases 498 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue advance a political, ideologic, or religious goal.
Criminal incidents, in contrast, involve extortion, murder, or some other nonpolitical objective.
Of the 415 incidents involving chemical, biological, radiologic, or nuclear materials, 151 cases are terrorist events for which information is sufficient to permit crosscase comparison.
These incidents have been classified according to type of agent, event, target, motive, and group (Figure 2).
Type of event includes the following categories: 1) conspiracy to acquire and use an agent, 2) attempted acquisition, 3) possession, 4) threatened use, 5) actual use, and 6) hoax or prank.
Most of the 151 incidents involve threatened or actual use, although rarely with the intent of inflicting mass casualties.
Of the 151 terrorist incidents, a subset of 33 involves biological agents (22 alleged biological cases were dropped from the analysis because they lacked key pieces of information).
Many of the biological-agent cases are hoaxes.
Since 1985, the number of terrorist incidents involving the threatened or actual use of chemical, biological, radiologic, or nuclear materials has risen sharply; a more modest increase has occurred in efforts to acquire such agents.
When criminal and terrorist incidents involving chemical or biological agents are examined, two large peaks become apparent (Figure 3a).
The 1995 peak was associated primarily with Aum Shinrikyo and related Lone psychopaths Figure 2.
Standardized typology used in analysis of politically or ideologically motivated incidents.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 499 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue copycat attacks in Japan; in 1998, incidents of actual use again increased abruptly (Figure 3a).
Hoaxes involving chemical or biological agents have shown two peaks in frequency over the past 30 years (Figure 3b).
The 1986 peak in chemical hoaxes was inspired by the second series of Tylenol poisonings, while the dramatic rise in biological hoaxes in 1998 is attributable to the flurry of anthrax threats in the United States.
The first wave of anthrax hoaxes followed the well-publicized arrest on February 18, 1998, of Larry Wayne Harris, a microbiologist linked to white-supremacist groups, after he allegedly threatened to release military-grade anthrax in Las Vegas (4).
Although Harriss anthrax turned out to be a harmless veterinary vaccine strain, sensational media coverage appears to have had the unintended effect of popularizing this agent among potential perpetrators.
The categories of terrorist organizations involved in the acquisition and use of chemical, biological, radiologic, or nuclear materials have changed over time.
Omitting incidents involving lone terrorists, recent years have seen a rise in cases involving three types of terrorist organizations: single-issue groups such as those dealing with abortion and animal rights; nationalist and separatist groups such as Chechen rebel organizations, the Kurdistan Workers Party, and the Tamil Tigers of Sri Lanka; and A B Figure 3.
(A) Actual chemical and biological incidents vs. hoaxes, 19601998 (278 cases).
(B) Chemical and biological hoaxes over time, 19601998 (93 cases: 43 chemical, 50 biological).
Emerging Infectious Diseases 500 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue apocalyptic religious cults such as Aum Shinrikyo (although Aum accounts for nearly all the latter cases).
No clear pattern is apparent in the types of groups involved in biological incidents, although religious fundamentalism as a motivation has emerged within the past 5 years.
The preferred choice of target has also changed over time.
If one examines 135 terrorist incidents for which the target is known, two types of targets have increased in frequency: the general civilian population (with the apparent intent of inflicting indiscriminate casualties) and a symbolic building or organization.
Motivations for the terrorist use of chemical, biological, radiologic, or nuclear materials appear to encompass a wide range of objectives.
(For each case, two analysts separately determined the best fit to a menu of motivations.)
In descending order, the main motivations are: 1) to promote nationalist or separatist objectives; 2) to retaliate or take revenge for a real or perceived injury; 3) to protest government policies; and 4) to defend animal rights (Figure 4).
A similar breakdown of motivations is found in the incidents involving biological agents, except for the greater prominence of apocalyptic prophecy (Figure 5).
Nearly all the latter cases are linked to Aum Shinrikyo, which may be either an outlier or a trend-setter.
A Figure 4.
Distribution of motivations for chemical and biological terrorism incidents, 1960Jan.
31, 1999 (147 cases).
B Figure 5.
Distribution of motivations for biological terrorism incidents, 1960Jan.
31, 1999 (33 cases).
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 501 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue The motivations underlying terrorist incidents with chemical, biological, radiologic, or nuclear materials appear to have shifted over time.
The predominant motivation from 1975 to 1989 was to protest government policies.
Since 1990, however, the leading motivations have been to further nationalist or separatist objectives and for retaliation or revenge.
In 1993, because of Aum Shinrikyo, apocalyptic prophecy also emerged as an important motivation.
The Table 1.
Comparison of Values Across Selected Case Motivation/Objective Weather Temporarily incapacitate Underground U.S. cities to (1970) demonstrate impotence of the federal government R.I.S.E. (1972) Kill off most of humanity to prevent the destruction of nature, then start human race over with a select few prominence of these three motivations becomes even greater when only incidents involving biological agents are examined.
In addition to compiling the incidents database, the project commissioned historical case studies of seven terrorist groups or individuals that acquired or employed biological agents (Table 1).
Two of the cases appear to be apocryphal, but the five confirmed cases share a number of characteristics that may be diagnostic Bioterrorist Incidents Ideology Target(s) Revolutionary Urban movement op- populations posed to Ameri- in the can imperialism United and the States Vietnam War Perpetrators were college students influenced by ecoterrorist ideology and 1960s drug culture Marxistrevolutionary ideology Initially entire world population, later narrowed to residents of five states around Chicago Specific targets unknown Agent(s) Delivery Reportedly Reportedly sought to ob- planned to tain agents at put incapacitaFt.
Detrick ting CW/BW by blackmail agents in urof gay soldier ban water Eight microbial pathogens including agents of typhoid fever, diphtheria, dysentery, and meningitis Planned BW aerosol attacks (dispersed by aircraft) and contamination of urban water supplies Outcome Report originated with U.S. Customs informant; case probably apocryphal Attack aborted when cultures were discovered; the two main perpetrators then fled to Cuba Probably an erroneous report, later repudiated by German government (BKA) Plot revealed when the cult collapsed and members turned informant Group was penetrated by FBI informants; four key members arrested Multiple CW attacks (in Matsumoto, Tokyo, and assassination campaign) killed at least 20 people and injured more than 1,000 Arrested when he talked openly about BW terrorism and made threatening remarks to U.S. officials Red Army Faction (1980) Allegedly planned BW attacks against West German officials and business leaders Group memUnknown ber allegedly cultivated botulinum toxin in a Paris safe-house Multiple methods, mainly contamination of restaurant salad bars Planned to deliver ricin through skin with DMSO and aloe vera, or as dr y aerosol Attempted on at least 10 occasions to disperse BW agents in aerosol form; all known attacks failed Rajneeshee Cult (1984) Scheme to incapacitate voters to win local election, seize political control of county Indian religious cult headed by a charismatic guru Anti-government tax protesters; right-wing patriot movement New Age doomsday cult seeking to establish a theocratic state in Japan, with a charismatic, powerhungry leader Links to Christian Identity and white supremacist groups (e.g., the Aryan Nation) Residents Salmonella of the town Typhimurium of The Dalles and Wasco County, Oregon IRS officials, U.S. deputy marshal, local law enforcement officials Mass civilian populations, individual opponents of cult, judges ruling against and police investigating cult Made vague threats against U.S. federal officials on behalf of rightwing patriot groups Ricin extracted from castor beans obtained by mail-order Biological agents (anthrax, botulinum toxin, Q fever Ebola virus) and chemical agents (sarin, VX, hydrogen cyanide) Obtained plague and anthrax (vaccine strain), reportedly isolated several other bacteria Minnesota Patriots Council (1991) Cause harm to the federal government, obtain personal revenge Aum Shinrikyo (1995) Prove an apocalyptic prophecy, eliminate enemies and rivals, halt an adverse court ruling, seize control of Japanese government Larry Wayne Harris (1998) To alert Americans to the Iraqi BW threat; seeks separate homeland for whites in the United States Discussed the dissemination of BW agents with cropduster aircraft and other methods BW, biological weapons; CW, chemical weapons; DMSO, dimethylsulfoxide; IRS, Internal Revenue Service; FBI, Federal Bureau of Investigation.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 502 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue of groups and individuals most likely to engage in bioterrorism (Table 2).
These characteristics include diffuse objectives, a sense of grandiosity, and a paranoid, conspiratorial, or apocalyptic world view that may lead to defensive aggression.
Such terrorists also lack a domestic political constituency that might restrain them from engaging in indiscriminate violence.
Religiously motivated cults such as Aum Shinrikyo and the Rajneeshees are cut off from the outside world and are often guided by a charismatic, all-powerful leader, making them less subject to societal norms.
Other factors not listed in the table include a tendency to escalate terrorist violence over time and to use innovative weapons and tactics.
rant salad bars in The Dalles, Oregon.
This event caused 751 cases of food poisoning, none fatal (5).
Incidents of bioterrorism in the Monterey Database are extremely diverse in terms of type of group and motivation.
The trend in recent years has been away from left-wing terrorism and toward nationalist-separatist groups and individuals or ad hoc groups bent on revenge.
There has also been an apparent rise in incidents perpetrated by violent sects or cults that believe in apocalyptic prophecy.
Even if the motivation to inflict mass casualties exists, however, few terrorist groups possess the scientific-technical resources required for the successful large-scale release of a biological agent.
Aum Shinrikyo, which had Table 2.
Selected Motivational Factors Associated with Bioterrorism Charismatic leadership X X X X No outside constituency X X X X X Apocalyptic ideology Loner or Sense of splinter paranoia and group grandiosity X X X X X X X X X Defensive aggression X X X X X Cases R.I.S.E.
Rajneeshee Cult Minnesota Patriots Council Aum Shinrikyo Larry Wayne Harris Apparently Apocryphal Cases Weather Underground Red Army Faction X X X X X X X Conclusions The Monterey Database indicates that incidents involving biological agents have been quite rare, with 66 criminal events and 55 terrorist events over the 40-year period from 1960 to 1999, although the frequency of such incidents (mainly hoaxes) has increased sharply in recent years.
The historical record includes few cases in which criminals or terrorists sought to inflict mass casualties with biological agents, and none in which they succeeded.
Only eight criminal attacks with biological agents led to casualties, inflicting a total of 29 deaths and 31 injuries.
Of the terrorist attacks with biological agents, only one resulted in casualties: the use by the Rajneeshee cult in 1984 of Salmonella Typhimurium bacteria to contaminate restau- considerable wealth and scientific expertise, failed in 10 separate attempts to carry out openair attacks against urban targets with aerosolized anthrax spores or botulinum toxin (6).
In summary, the historical record suggests that future incidents of bioterrorism will probably involve hoaxes and relatively smallscale attacks, such as food contamination.
Nevertheless, the diffusion of dual-use technologies relevant to the production of biological and toxin agents, and the potential availability of scientists and engineers formerly employed in sophisticated biological warfare programs such as those of the Soviet Union and South Africa, suggest that the technical barriers to masscasualty terrorism are eroding.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 503 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue 3.
For a revealing account of the inconsistencies and inaccuracies in the secondary literature on CBW terrorism, see Ron Purver, Chemical and biological terrorism: the threat according to the open literature (Ottawa, Canada: Canadian Security Intelligence Service, June 1995).
4.
Edwards TM. Catching a 48-hour bug.
Time 1998 Mar 2; p. 56-7.
5.
T�r�k TJ, Tauxe RV, Wise RP, Livengood JR, Sokolow R, Mauvais S, et al.
A large community outbreak of salmonellosis caused by intentional contamination of restaurant salad bars.
JAMA 1997;278:389-95.
6.
WuDunn S, Miller J, Broad WJ.
How Japan germ terror alerted world.
New York Times 1998 May 26; Sect A:1 (col 1), A:10 (col 1-5).
Acknowledgments The author thanks Jason Pate and Diana McCauley for their outstanding work in compiling and analyzing the Monterey Database of chemical, biological, radiologic, and nuclear incidents.
Dr. Tucker is director of the Chemical and Biological Weapons Nonproliferation Project, Center for Nonproliferation Studies, Monterey Institute of International Studies.
References 1.
Parker-Tursman J. FBI briefed on districts terror curbs.
Pittsburgh Post-Gazette, May 5, 1999.
2.
Weiner T. Reno says U.S. may stockpile medicine for terrorist attacks.
New York Times 1998 Apr 23; Sect.
A:12.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 504 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue The Threat of Biological Attack: Why Concern Now? David W. Siegrist Potomac Institute for Policy Studies, Arlington, Virginia, USA For a biological attack to occur, three elements must be in place: a vulnerable target, a person or group with the capability to attack, and the intent (by the perpetrator) to carry out such an attack.
Much of what can be done to limit the capability and the intent of potential attackers is already on its way to being accomplished.
The most work, and the highest return on investment, involve reducing the vulnerability of the United States to both intentional and unintentional pathogen releases.
Vulnerability to Biological Attack Among weapons of mass destruction, biological weapons are more destructive than Figure.
Effects of a nuclear and a biological weapons Address for correspondence: David W. Siegrist, Potomac Institute for Policy Studies, 1600 Wilson Boulevard, Suite 1200, Arlington, VA 22209, USA; fax: 703-525-0299; e-mail: siegrist@potomacinstitute.com. chemical weapons, including nerve gas.
In certain circumstances, biological weapons can be as devastating as nuclear onesa few kilograms of anthrax can kill as many people as a Hiroshima-size nuclear weapon (Figure).
The United States is unprepared to deal with a biological attack.
Over the past several years, preparedness strides have been made, especially in the largest cities.
However, much of the needed equipment is not available.
Pathogen sensors are not in place to detect that a biological attack has taken place.
New medicines are needed.
In combating terrorist attacks, treatment is a more practical approach than prevention; yet many biological agents are extremely difficult to treat with existing medicines once the symptoms appear.
In addition, many of the most important prophylactic drugs have limited shelf lives and cannot be stockpiled.
Moreover, their effectiveness could be compromised by a sophisticated attacker.
Local emergency medical response capability is limited.
A number of localities define a mass casualty event as one with more than a dozen casualties, far fewer than an intentional biological release could cause.
Emergency room capacity in major cities can be overwhelmed all too quickly by more common emergencies.
Much emergency medical capability is release.
also located in downtown areas that may be targeted for attack.
The National Disaster Medical System has voluntary access to approximately 100,000 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 505 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue hospital beds across the country to cope with a large-scale medical emergency.
However, not all of those beds have the specialized means for patient respiration and supportive therapy that may be needed in a crisis.
Such equipment is not available in large numbers (
Further, current federal plans favor not evacuating injured people from the affected area but may relocate patients who were already in hospitals to free up local bed space (2).
This indicates that localities need to increase their own capabilities.
The federal government will augment local efforts, not supersede them.
Steps are being taken to decrease U.S. vulnerability to biological attack.
Technical research is being supported, needed medicines and vaccines will be acquired, and emergency response templates are being developed.
One of the reforms was setting up the Office of State and Local Domestic Preparedness Support within the Department of Justice.
The office has developed a set of objective criteria that measure domestic readiness to deal with an attack by a weapon of mass destruction.
No locality has yet qualified for the top rankingbeing prepared for such a crisis (3). expertise is required to produce high-quality, military-grade biological weapons and reliable means of dissemination, terrorist applications are less demanding.
Making biological weapons requires sample cultures; the means to grow, purify, and stabilize them; and the means to reliably disseminate them.
All these tasks pose substantial but not insurmountable challenges.
More than 1,500 biological culture libraries worldwide, as well as numerous research institutions and natural sources, maintain sample cultures (5).
Growth media and fermenters to multiply the sample cultures are widely available.
Purifying, concentrating, and stabilizing agents is demanding and dangerous but not a great technical challenge.
Freeze-drying the product and milling it into particles of a uniform respirable size requires even more technical capabilities.
A state sponsor may be needed to do it, although companies and institutes regularly spray dry and mill commercial microbes.
Moreover, a respirable aerosol of germs can be achieved through other highpressure devices.
Biological production and weapon-producing facilities can be small, inexpensive, and inconspicuous.
Equipment to develop biological arms may have legitimate commercial and research purposes, as well as nefarious ones.
Unlike nuclear weapons, biological weapons do not require unique ingredients that are ready objects of arms control.
Institutional Capability Depending on their sophistication, terrorist groups may or may not have the capability to build broad-impact biological weapons.
However, most nations have the capability to make biological weapons.
Some 18 nations are believed to have done so, including the former Soviet Union and several nations the State Department lists as supporting terrorism.
Perpetrator Capability Biological weapons can range in lethality from salmonella used to temporarily incapacitate to super bubonic plague engineered for mass casualities.
Biological weapons include ricin, which an extremist may use to assassinate a single local official, as well as pathogens with high transmissibility and broad potential impact.
Biological agents may be used to kill or disable humans or to attack plants or animals to harm a nations economy.
Given that broad scope, biological attacks have already taken place and continue to be a distinct probability for the foreseeable future (4).
However, of greatest concern is the capability to deliver a sizable lethal attack against a population center.
Technical Capability Making reliable biological weapons requires art as well as science.
Such weapons are not readily adaptable to cookbook type recipes that can be implemented by novices.
Nevertheless, technical expertise and sophistication about biological processes have become much more widespread.
Moreover, even though technical Intention to Use Biological Weapons Why would anyone wish to use biological weapons? A leading entity with a motive to perpetrate a biological attack could be a rogue state as an act of clandestine warfare.
The very strength of a superpower may provide an incentive to adversaries to challenge this strength unconventionally.
If a rogue regime were to mount such an unconventional asymmetric attack, they might Emerging Infectious Diseases 506 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue choose biological weapons because their extreme destructive potential is concentrated in a relatively small and unremarkable package with virtually no detectable sensor signature.
Because of the agents incubation period, the perpetrators might be gone before anyone knew that an attack had been made.
Finally, biological agents, unlike ballistic missiles, lend themselves to clandestine dissemination.
Warfare itself may be becoming more total and losing much of its political character in some situations.
Biological weapons, which kill people but leave infrastructure intact, could become the poor mans neutron bomb.
In the past, the essence of terrorism was to make a political statement through violence.
It was a political act designed to influence an audience.
Levels of violence were carefully calculated so as to draw attention but not to be so high as to alienate supporters or trigger overwhelming response from authorities.
That continues to be a main theme of conventional terrorism.
However, in so-called postmodern or superterrorism, the aim is to maximize the number of casualties (6).
This reflects a shift in the goal of the terrorists, from trying to make a political statement through violence to maximizing damage to the target as an end in itself.
Such terrorists may be motivated by ethnic or religious considerations, among others (7).
Even conventional terrorism tends to escalate levels of violence to keep garnering attention.
The threat of biological weapons imparts high levels of fear that may make them desirable to perpetrators who wish to terrorize, even more than to kill.
Threats have to become increasingly credible after the initial shock of specious threats has diminished.
Even a minor biological attack, made to demonstrate credibility, could have a disproportionate impact.
Thus, a certain subset of terrorists may be motivated to commit mass casualty terrorism, including biological terrorism.
infectious diseases on the world (Table) (8).
An influenza pandemic was averted 2 years ago by the alert and energetic actions of epidemiologists in Hong Kong and around the world.
Slower reactions might have permitted the pathogens genes to shuffle among human and avian infections to make the flu strain readily transmissible from person to person.
Multidrugresistant tuberculosis is increasing rapidly in Russia in part because of lack of adequate antibiotics (9).
More health challenges are almost certainly in store.
Causes contributing to emerging disease outbreaks (overcrowding, deforestation, airline travel) will likely continue (9).
Health security and national security needs overlap.
If the United States prepares to confront and defeat intentional human releases of pathogens, we will be better prepared for the unpredictable but robust threats likely to occur from nature.
For emergency medical response, patients need rapid and efficacious treatment, whether the source of an outbreak of disease is intentional or natural.
Medical research needs drugs that treat disease after symptoms become apparent.
Such drugs might target common features of disease (10), e.g., inflammation cascade and toxic shock.
Aerosol challenge is also typical of both military threats and other airborne pathogens; vaccines that enhance mucosal immunity may mitigate them.
Expression of specific genes that may be critical and unique to a number of pathogens might one day be inhibited by medicine.
Effective and safe multipurpose and specific drug treatments would help in the battle against both naturally occurring and intentional releases of infectious disease.
Through advanced biotechnology, we could begin to reverse the offense-defense mismatch that now greatly favors disease over cure.
Conclusions Vulnerability and capability, two prerequisites of bioterrorism, are in place.
Enhancing emergency medical preparedness and supporting advanced pharmaceutical research for multivalent drugs, among other measures, will help us deter and defeat deliberate and naturally occurring pathogen releases, as well as increase the general health and well-being of the population.
The intention of potential attackers is difficult to manage.
Therefore, Nonintentional Pathogen Releases Certain kinds of biological assaults can be predicted with even higher confidence than bioterrorist attacks.
Stephen Morse, Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency, has said that Mother Nature is the greatest terrorist.
Since infectious diseases were widely dismissed as a world health threat some 30 years ago, nature has loosed some 30 new or reemerging Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 507 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Table.
New and reemerging viruses Viruses New Human herpesvirus 6 (HHV-6) Human herpesvirus 7 (HHV-7) GS viruses (hepatitis) Human herpesvirus 8 (HHV-8) Reemerging Cocoa swollen shoot Dengue Ebola Equine morbillivirus (8) Date 1986 1990 1994 1995 Family Herpesvirus Herpesvirus Flavivirus Herpesvirus Badnavirus Bunyavirus Flavivirus Morbillivirus Comments Destroyed 200 million cocoa trees in West Africa.
Emerged in Brisbane, Australia.
Causes acute respiratory disease with high mortality in horses.
Believed to cause a fatal encephalitis in humans.
Caused death rates in seals in the Baltic and North Sea.
Similar viruses subsequently recognized as responsible for porpoise and dolphin deaths in the Irish Sea and the Mediterranean.
Emerged in China, spread naturally through UK and Europe.
Introduced to Wardang Island off the coast of South Australia to test potential for rabbit population control, accidentally spread to mainland decimating rabbit populations.
1994 Hantaan group Phocine distemper 1987 Bunyaviruses Morbillivirus Rabbit calicivirus disease /Viral hemorrhagic disease 1985 Calicivirus Rift Valley fever Tomato spotted wilt Whitefly-transmitted geminiviruses (group III geminiviruses) Bunyaviruses Bunyavirus Geminivirus limiting our vulnerability is the most promising way to prevent or mitigate biological attacks on the United States.
Mr. Siegrist is research fellow at the Potomac Institute for Policy Studies and is director of Studies for Countering Biological Terrorism.
He is also an adjunct faculty member at Georgetown University, where he was National Strategy Public Policy Fellow and where he teaches classes on national security.
He is the project leader of Countering Biological Terrorism in the U.S., from Oceana Press (May 1999).
References 1.
Army Reserve National Guard.
Stakeholders III Conference Medical Panel.
National Guard Bureau, Arlington, VA, December 1998.
2.
Tonat K. Office of Emergency Preparedness, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services.
Panel discussion at conference Integrating Medical and Emergency Response, Washington, DC, March 10, 1999.
3.
Mitchel A. Office of State and Local Domestic Preparedness Support, U.S. Department of Justice.
Panel discussion at conference Integrating Medical and Emergency Response, Washington, DC, March 10, 1999.
4.
Carus S. Bioterrorism and biocrimes: the illicit use of biological agents in the 20th Century.
Washington: Center for Counterproliferation Research, National Defense University; 1998.
5.
Broad W, Miller J.
The threat of germ weapons is rising.
Fear, too.
The New York Times, December 27, 1998.
6.
Laqueur W. Postmodern terrorism.
Foreign Affairs; Sep/Oct 1996.
7.
Ikle F. Waiting for the next Lenin.
The National Interest; spring 1997.
8.
Cann AJ. Principles of molecular virology.
2d ed. San Diego: Harcourt Brace 
Academic Press; 1997.
p. 230.
9.
Lee C. US cant ignore implications of TB plaguing Russia.
USA Today, February 8, 1999, p. 16A and 232.
10.
Committee on R
Emerging Infectious Diseases 508 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Nuclear Blindness: An Overview of the Biological Weapons Programs of the Former Soviet Union and Iraq Christopher J. Davis Johns Hopkins University Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies The demise of the biological weapons capability of the United States in 1969 and the advent of the Biological and Toxin Weapons Convention in 1972 caused governments in the West to go to sleep to the possibility of biological weapons development throughout the rest of the world, as technically knowledgeable workers were transferred and retired, intelligence desks were closed down, and budgets were cut.
By 1979, despite the Sverdlovsk anthrax release, a senior British government policy official described any biological weapons threat as nebulous.
President Nixons biological weapons disarmament declaration in 1969 had conveyed the impression that biological weapons were uncontrollable and that the U.S. program had not been successful in producing usable weapons (when in fact the opposite was true).
Add to this the rise of truly intercontinental ballistic missile delivery of nuclear weapons, and the stage was set for what I have termed nuclear blindness and defined as the tunnel vision suffered by successive governments, brought on by the mistaken belief that it is only the size of the bang that matters.
Throughout this period, both the former Soviet Union and Iraq conceived, albeit in different ways, their new biological weapons programs.
It took until 1989-1991 for government technical experts in the West to persuade the world and their own governments that these programs were real and of enormous potential importance to the security of the West, if not the whole world.
Too many times in the past we have failed to anticipate future developments; refused to think the unthinkable and expect the unexpected.
Too many times we have been out maneuvered by those who take the time to think and plan and do Address for correspondence: Christopher J. Davis, Og House, Ogbourne St. George, Marlborough, Wiltshire, SN8 1TF, United Kingdom; fax: 44-(0)-1672-841418; e-mail: christopher.davis1@virgin.net.
not simply rely on reacting to events.
We must learn to think like our potential adversaries if we are to avoid conflict or blunt an attack, because only superior thinking and planning (not just better technology) will enable us to survive biological warfare.
The Former Soviet Union The origins of the biological weapons program of the former Soviet Union stretch back to statements by Lenin, and experimental work was under way by the late 1920s.
The modern era was ushered in, however, only with the postwar military building program, which established infrastructure for research, development, testing, production, and delivery of a variety of agents and weapons.
On the other side of the globe, the allied biological weapons program had grown from the fledgling efforts of British research into anthrax and the development of the World War II anthrax cattlecake retaliation weapon into a large U.S.-based research and development (R
By 1969, the U.S. military had accepted seven type-classified agents, and, at plants such as the one at Pine Bluff in Arkansas, they could produce 650 tons of agent per month for filling into weapons.
This thriving offensive program was unilaterally abandoned in 1969 as a result of a complicated mixture of politics, secret intelligence information, new technological developments, and the Vietnam War.
These developments gave impetus to the creation of the Biological and Toxin Weapons Convention, originally drafted by the British but finalized by the Soviet Union.
Although the Soviet Union signed the Convention at its inception in 1972, it did not believe that the United States would be so foolish as to abandon its biological weapons capability, regarding the disarmament agreement as a worthless piece of paper.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 509 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue In 1973 and 1974, the Soviet Politburo formed and funded the organization known most recently as Biopreparat (Chief Directorate for Biological Preparations), designed to carry out offensive biological weapons R
At no time did civilian biotechnology work ever comprise much more than 15% of the activity at any of the 52 sites under the aegis of Biopreparat.
Ultimately it was controlled by the Ministry of Defense, the Military Industrial Commission, and other state organs, all the way up to the Central Committee and what became eventually the Office of the President.
Its head, a general, retained special access to the Central Committee from its inception, and through its links with the Academies of Science and Medical Science, Ministry of Health, and the Anti-Plague Institutes, recruited a generation of scientists who elsewhere in the world underpinned the expanding pharmaceutical and biotechnology industries and academic life-sciences research.
The whole system probably employed at its height at least 50,000 people, many of whom were scientists and technicians with very high security clearance that identified them as part of a biological weapons program more closely held and more secret than its nuclear weapons counterpart.
The system was always able to draw on the best from any source but was, to a certain extent, self-sufficient.
Not all of the 52 establishments were occupied with microbiology or weaponssome were workshops, garages, and cover operations; others supported the program directly with fermenter design and construction or building of weapons test chambers; while yet others carried out advanced research, which would then be given to other institutes for development.
Often there was internal competition, with one project being given to a number of facilities to see who would come up with the best idea.
In its first 15 years alone, Biopreparat probably cost at least 1.5 billion rubles to create and runa large sum for life-sciences R
The main purpose of the enormous Biopreparat capability was to hide biological weapons research, development, and production formerly carried out solely in Ministry of Defense establishments behind a facade of nominally civilian biotechnology and pharmaceutical enterprises.
The two systems, the former Ministry of Defense complex of biological weapons facilities and the new Biopreparat facilities, continued to operate side-by-side.
The Ministry of Defense facilities themselves probably employed another 15,000 workers and had a separate budget, so that the potential within the system as a whole, which is how it should be considered, was large and dwarfed the by-then long-abandoned U.S. offensive program.
Its capacity for production of agent was measured not in tons but in hundreds of tons for each of at least nine separate sites, primarily plague, tularemia, glanders, anthrax, smallpox, and Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis.
Another mission of Biopreparat was to apply advances in biotechnology (genetic engineering, in particular) to improving the biological weapons capability of the former Soviet Union.
This mission took several forms, supported primarily by the then vice-president of the Academy of Sciences, Yuri Ovchinnikov, the most influential Soviet biomedical scientist of the 1970s.
He saw a way around arms control treaties and weapons conventions by using microbes to produce biologically active substances that would replace classic chemical weapons; their production could then be concealed in the biotechnology or pharmaceutical industry.
He also envisaged that the government would use genetic engineering to produce a new generation of biological weapons agents with enhanced capability for expressing toxins and other biologically active substances and to improve overall weapons effectiveness.
The outcome of the first of these two programs is not known, but the latter was very successful.
Moreover, the new Biopreparat-based program was able to address all aspects of agent production and delivery, not just the most advanced microbiological ones.
It built strength in depth, having as its main aims to improve industrial production scale-up techniques, microbial production rates, yields of viable microorganisms, virulence, and resistance of microorganisms to antibiotics; to maximize viability of agent during dissemination and increased survivability of biological aerosols; and to enhance the ability of microorganisms to degrade the targets natural defenses.
The leaders of the program foresaw increasing encroachment of international arms control Emerging Infectious Diseases 510 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue processes into the territory of sovereign states.
Thus, they perceived the need for its weapons to become invulnerable to first strike or counterattack.
Key technical targets associated with such an approach were the development of dry solid particulate agent formulations, miniaturized production facilities, mobile production and filling facilities, strains resistant to multiple antibiotics, cruise missile dissemination system, and combination organisms.
By addressing every aspect of weapon production, from selection of new strains of organisms to the behavior of biological aerosols under every possible condition of climate and topography, through the genetic engineering of antibiotic resistance and the design of optimum dissemination and delivery systems, the former Soviet Union was able to envisage the achievement of a miniaturized mobile production and weapon-making capability invulnerable to clandestine monitoring, invasive arms inspection, or attack in the event of war (because it was beyond identification); agents precisely matched to particular scenarios and human targets and incapable of being treated; a variety of dissemination systems, including cruise missiles; agents resistant to degradation by heat, light, cold, UV radiation, ionizing radiation, and various antibiotics; and dry formulations of agents capable of remaining viable in long-term storage.
By the time of the breakup of the former Soviet Union, from which the Russian Confederation emerged in 1992, much had been achieved and war mobilization plans were in place for the surge production of huge quantities of the agents mentioned earlier, as well as a number of others, such as Marburg virus.
Of overwhelming importance has been the capability to undertake a strategic attack using plague or smallpox.
Intercontinental ballistic missiles with MIRVed warheads containing plague were available for launch even before 1985, and SS-11 and SS-18 missiles have been mentioned in this connection.
Concepts of use had been developed for each of the biological agents formally accepted into use by the army.
For instance, the principal agents designated as tactical or operational for use on the battlefield were tularemia and Venezuelan equine encephalomyelitis, whereas anthrax and Marburg virus were nominated for attacking rear areas.
The third category of agents comprised the highly transmissible agents smallpox and plague, which were categorized as strategic weapons and destined for use against enemy population centers.
What happened after Vladimir Pasechnik (the former general director of Science Production Organisation Farmpribor and director of The All Union Scientific Research Institute of Ultra Pure Biopreparations in Leningrad [St. Petersburg]) defected in 1989 constitutes a long and complex story, but in January 1991 the firstever visit to Biopreparat facilities was undertaken, by a joint U.K./U.S. technical team, under a cloak of secrecy.
After the subsequent defection of Kanadjan Alibekov (a former senior deputy director of Biopreparat) in 1992, the United States and the United Kingdom were certain enough that the offensive biological weapons program was continuing that they challenged the new Russian regime openly about it as late as 1993.
By then substantial changes had taken place within Biopreparat, and today a concerted effort is under way to help the Russians civilianize these former biological weapons R
However, questions remain about the Russian program: What happened to the part of the program in Ministry of Defence facilities that western experts have been unable to visit? What happened to plans detailing every aspect of production and deployment? What happened to the Ovchinnikov bioregulator program? What happened to the thousands of personnel involved in the Biopreparat program? What happened to the R
Iraq Iraq has stated that its biological weapons program dates to at least 1974.
It was carried out Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 511 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue in great secrecy, after the Biological and Toxin Weapons Convention had been signed.
The program was first conducted in an ostensibly civilian organization called the State Organization for Trade and Industry until this was superseded by the Military Industrial Commission.
As with all other major military programs, biological weapons R
Much of what happened between the supposed inception of the program in 1974 and the establishment of a group of biologists within the Al-Muthanna chemical weapons complex in 1984 is unknown.
In 1987, the Al-Muthanna research group was transferred to the Al-Salman facility, and work was expanded to include the investigation of fungal and antiplant agents; 1988 saw the establishment of the Al-Hakam Factory, an industrial-scale production facility designed to produce anthrax and botulinum toxin for filling into weapons.
This project was completed quickly by using equipment from nominally civilian facilities, such as those used to produce vaccines; the factory itself produced biological agent, which was filled into weapons and deployed in late 1990.
The program was further expanded in 1990 when viruses were added to the range of agents under development and production capacity was enhanced by the acquisition and integration of civilian biotechnology facilities by the Military Industrial Commission.
According to the Iraqis, the program was terminated in 1991, after the adoption of UN SCR687, and agents, weapons, munitions, and documents were destroyed.
However, the United Nations Special Commission (UNSCOM) believes that from 1991 to 1995 Iraq actively preserved biological weapons capability.
The Agents, Weapons, and Means of Delivery The UNSCOM belief that three biological agents were filled into weapons is supported by Iraqi statements concerning the filling of munitions and their deployment ready for delivery.
For one of these agents, Botulinum toxin, UNSCOM also possesses objective evidence; the other two were probably anthrax and Clostridium perfringens spores.
Approximately 380,000 liters of Botulinum toxin were manufactured, along with 84,250 liters of anthrax spores and 3,400 liters of C. perfringens spores.
In addition, 2,200 liters of aflatoxin were produced.
All these figures represent preconcentration totals and may be underestimates.
Ricin toxin and the antiplant agents wheat bunt and corn smut were also produced.
Camel pox is known to have been under development as well.
This disparate list of biological agents, which at first seems to contain substances not previously conceived as potential offensive biological weapons agents, on closer inspection reveals a rationale based on the possession of a multipotent arsenal having lethal, incapacitating, oncogenic, ethnic, economic, terror, and variable time-onset capabilities.
In addition, these agents are capable of being used to attack people through the lungs and the skin, as well as with carriers such as triethylamine, CN or CS, or as a toxic coating in fragmentation weapons.
Agents were filled into various weapons for dissemination.
By the end of 1990, according to Iraqi statements, 25 SCUD/Al-Hussein missiles were readied for use with biological weapons warheads (each carrying 145 liters of agent) and deployed for action.
At least 160 R400 retarded aerial bombs, carrying the distinctive blackstripe identification around them, may also have been filled with 90-liter charges of Botulinum toxin and ready for use.
UNSCOM has evidence to corroborate the Iraqi claim.
The Iraqis also intended to fill R400 bombs with anthrax and aflatoxin.
Originally designed and filled with chemical agents, 155-mm shells were also tested with a ricin toxin fill.
At least three fuel drop tanks were completely modified and fitted with Venturi mechanisms to facilitate aerosol release, for dispersal of 2,200-liter loads of anthrax and possibly Botulinum toxin, using F1 aircraft as the delivery means.
Postscript UNSCOM has no confidence that Iraq has abandoned its biological weapons program.
The true scale and scope of the Iraqi biological weapons program are, despite all UNSCOMs efforts, still not known.
Dr. Davis is consultant in Pharmaceutical Medicine and Applied Physiology and director of the ORAQ Consultancy Ltd., United Kingdom.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 512 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Aum Shinrikyo: Once and Future Threat? Kyle B. Olson Research Planning, Inc., Arlington, Virginia, USA On March 20, 1995, members of the Aum Shinrikyo cult entered the Tokyo subway system and released sarin, a deadly nerve agent.
The subway attack was the most deadly assault in an ongoing campaign of terror waged by this mysterious cult.
Four years later, with Aum Shinrikyo attempting to rebuild itself, many in Japan and around the world are asking whether the Supreme Truth Sect poses a current or future threat.
Answering this question may further our understanding, not only of the Aum but also of other extremist and terrorist groups.
Aum Shinrikyo began its public campaign of terror on June 27, 1994.
On that Monday in Matsumoto, a city of 300,000 population 322 kilometers northwest of Tokyo, a group of cult members drove a converted refrigerator truck into a nondescript residential neighborhood.
Parking in a secluded parking lot behind a stand of trees, they activated a computer-controlled system to release a cloud of sarin.
The nerve agent floated toward a cluster of private homes, a mid-rise apartment building, town homes, and a small dormitory.
This neighborhood was targeted for a specific reason.
The dormitory was the residence of all three judges sitting on a panel hearing a lawsuit over a real-estate dispute in which Aum Shinrikyo was the defendant.
Cult lawyers had advised the sects leadership that the decision was likely to go against them.
Unwilling to accept a costly reversal, Aum responded by sending a team to Matsumoto to guarantee that the judges did not hand down an adverse judgment.
A light breeze (3 to 5 knots) gently pushed the deadly aerosol cloud of sarin into a courtyard formed by the buildings.
The deadly agent affected the inhabitants of many of the buildings, entering through windows and doorways, left open to the warm night air.
Within a short time, seven people were dead.
Five Address for correspondence: Kyle B. Olson, Research Planning, Inc., 6400 Arlington Blvd., Suite 1100, Arlington, VA 22042, USA; fax: 703-237-8085; e-mail: kolson@rpihq.com. hundred others were transported to local hospitals, where approximately 200 would require at least one nights hospitalization.
After successfully completing their mission, the cultists drove off to Kamakuishki, a rural community at the foot of Mount Fuji, home to golf courses, parks, dairy farms, small villages, and the headquarters of Aum Shinrikyo in Japan.
The cults facilities consisted of a number of motley buildings, factories, and dormitories.
Aum Shinrikyos next major act of violence would serve as a wake-up call to the world regarding the prospects of weapons of mass destruction and terrorism.
On the morning of March 20, 1995, packages were placed on five different trains in the Tokyo subway system.
The packages consisted of plastic bags filled with a chemical mix and wrapped inside newspapers.
Once placed on the floor of the subway car, each bag was punctured with a sharpened umbrella tip, and the material was allowed to spill onto the floor of the subway car.
As the liquid spread out and evaporated, vaporous agent spread throughout the car.
Tokyo was experiencing a coordinated, simultaneous, multi-point assault.
The attack was carried out at virtually the same moment at five different locations in the worlds largest city: five trains, many kilometers apart, all converging on the center of Tokyo.
The resulting deaths and injuries were spread throughout central Tokyo.
First reports came from the inner suburbs and then, very quickly, cries for help began to flow in from one station after another, forming a rapidly tightening ring around the station at Kasumagaseki.
This station serves the buildings that house most of the key agencies of the Japanese government.
Most of the major ministries, as well as the national police agency, have their headquarters at Kasumagaseki.
By the end of that day, 15 subway stations in the worlds busiest subway system had been affected.
Of these, stations along the Hbiya line were the most heavily affected, some with as many as 300 to 400 persons involved.
The Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 513 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue number injured in the attacks was just under 3,800.
Of those, nearly 1,000 actually required hospitalizationsome for no more than a few hours, some for many days.
A very few are still hospitalized.
And 12 people were dead.
Within 48 hours of the subway attack, police were carrying out raids against Aum Shinrikyo facilities throughout Japan.
Police entered cult facilities carrying sophisticated detection systems and wearing military-issued chemical gear (which was issued to the Tokyo police the week before the subway attack).
The real target of the raids that began on March 17 was the building known as Satyan 7, a supposed shrine to the Hindu god Shiva, the most prominent figure in the Aum Shinrikyo religious pantheon.
In reality, the building housed a moderately large-scale chemical weapons production facility, designed by cult engineers, with first-rate equipment purchased over-the-counter.
Although the facilitys design was crude by industry standards, it was nonetheless very capable of producing the sarin used in the Matsumoto attack.
At the time of the Tokyo attack, however, Satyan 7 was not in service, having been mothballed after an accident during the previous summer.
In an effort to get the plant back into production, the cult had, during the fall of 1994, unsuccessfully attempted to recruit Russian chemical-weapons engineers.
The cult was adept at recruiting educated professionals (scientists and engineers), but most were young and largely inexperienced.
Satyan 7 was designed to produce sarin, not on a small terrorist scale, but in nearly battlefield quantities: thousands of kilograms a year.
Chemical weapons were not, however, the only option available to the Aum.
The first cult laboratory for toxin production was actually in place by 1990 and was subsequently replaced with two new laboratories, one at Kamakuishki and the other in Tokyo.
Aum dabbled in many different biological agents.
They cultured and experimented with botulin toxin, anthrax, cholera, and Q fever.
In 1993, Ashahara led a group of 16 cult doctors and nurses to Zaire, on a supposed medical mission.
The actual purpose of the trip to Central Africa was to learn as much as possible about and, ideally, to bring back samples of Ebola virus.
In early 1994, cult doctors were quoted on Russian radio as discussing the possibility of using Ebola as a biological weapon.
The cult attempted several apparently unsuccessful acts of biological terrorism in Japan between 1990 and 1995.
As early as April 1990, the cult had tried to release botulin toxin from a vehicle driving around the Diet and other government buildings in central Tokyo.
In early June of 1993, another attempt was made to release botulin toxin, this time in conjunction with the wedding of the crown prince.
A vehicle equipped with a spray device was driven around the imperial palace as well as the main government buildings in central Tokyo.
Later that month, pursuing an alternative technology, the cult attempted to release anthrax spores from its mid-rise Tokyo office building laboratory.
At that time, police and media reported foul smells, brown steam, some pet deaths, and stains on cars and sidewalks.
Then, in March 1995, just before the sarin subway attack, an attempt to spray botulin toxin in the subway at Kasumagaseki Station was preempted by a cult member who opted not to load the improvised briefcase sprayers with actual agent.
No injuries were reported in any of these biological events despite the fact the cult was dealing with very toxic materials.
The cults failures can be attributed to a variety of factors.
The cult may not have had the right agents or the right technologic facilities; they could have overcooked the bioagents or not known how to use them.
While the cult was well financed, it was not very successful in its efforts to recruit biological scientists.
Still, the possibility exists that casualties associated with some of these releases might have not been detected or were attributed to other causes.
The cults operations were worldwide, promoting a theology drawn from different sources, including Buddhism, Christianity, Shamanism, Hinduism, and New Age beliefs.
Cult membership around the world was likely 20,000 to 40,000.
One cult leader estimated the cults net worth in March of 1995 at about $1.5 billion.
The money was collected through donations, tithing, sales of religious paraphernalia, videotape and book sales, and other sources.
The cult conducted seminars and hosted training courses for members, offering indoctrination in Aums teachings, charging believers from hundreds to tens of thousands of dollars for attending these sessions.
Aum Shinrikyo also had a number of commercial enterprises, even a Emerging Infectious Diseases 514 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue company that manufactured computers.
Imported components from Taiwan were assembled in a cult factory at Kamakuishki and sold in Aums computer store in downtown Tokyo.
The cult also ran a chain of restaurants in Tokyo and several other Japanese cities.
Another source of income was the practice of green mail.
Aum would threaten to establish a cult compound in a city and, if the city fathers did not bribe them to go away, the cult would set up shop.
Several cities paid rather than have Aum establish operations there.
The cult manufactured illegal drugs and had a marketing agreement with the Japanese Mafia (the Yakuza).
In 1996, the Yakuza would be found responsible for the assassination of the cults lead scientist, Dr. Hideo Murai, in the days following the Tokyo subway attack.
Concerned at his frequent televised appearances, the Yakuza silenced him for fear that he would betray the linkage between the two shadowy groups.
Extortion, theft, and murder were also part of the cults fund-raising activities.
Among the cult leaders, Doomsday guru Shoko Ashahara is the undisputed head
.
Ashahara (born Chizuo Matsumoto) had numerous exalted titles, including venerated master, yogi, and holy pope.
Highly charismatic, this partially blind, apparently very talented yoga instructor was very ambitious politically and financially.
He and more than 20 of his followers ran for Parliament in 1989.
They were defeated, which some Japanese analysts have suggested marks the moment when the cults leader elected to pursue weapons of mass destruction and the violent overthrow of the established order.
Millennial visions and apocalyptic scenarios dominate the groups doctrine, evidenced by the prominent role of Nostradamus as a prophet in Aum Shinrikyo teaching.
Ashahara has, on many occasions, claimed to be the reincarnated Jesus Christ, as well as the first enlightened one since the Buddha.
He has frequently preached about a coming Armageddon, which he describes as a global conflict that would, among other things, destroy Japan with nuclear, biological, and chemical weapons.
According to Ashahara, only the followers of Aum Shinrikyo will survive this conflagration.
Another cult leader, Fumihiro Joyu, now 35 years old, was a bright young engineer with the Japanese space program, specializing in artificial intelligence.
He left that organization to go to work for Aum, where he very quickly rose through the ranks, ultimately to head the cults operations in Russia.
Joyu oversaw this important cult expansion, among other things investing as much as $12 million in the form of payoffs to well-placed officials.
The cults investment paid off with expedited access to office buildings, dormitories, and other facilities throughout Russia.
At the time of the Tokyo subway attack, the cults principle venture in Russia was the Moscow-Japan University, with headquarters in offices across the street from the Bolshoi Ballet.
Their senior Russian partner in the university was a man by the name of Oleg Lobov, at that time also chairman of Russias National Security Council and a close confidant of Boris Yeltsin.
Joyu was convicted of perjury after the subway investigation, but he received an extremely light sentence (3 years) for his involvement in the cults activities.
Joyu has apparently maintained close ties to the cult, and he is slated for release toward the end of this year.
After leaving prison, he may make a play for leadership of the remaining cult elements.
He is the most charismatic member of the cult, other than Ashahara.
In the days right after the Tokyo subway attack, he was on Japanese television so frequently, and featured in magazines and newspapers so often, that he became a teen heartthrob.
In the days and weeks immediately following the gas attack, more than 200 key members of the cult were arrested.
Approximately 120 are still in jail, on trial, or have been convicted.
Ashahara himself has been on trial for 3 years.
The trial may continue for 5 or 6 years, a judicial timetable that is aggressive by Japanese standards in cases where the defendant refuses to cooperate with the prosecution.
Three cult members involved in the attack are still at large.
Russian operations were ended by legal action and the assets seized by the government.
The cults legal status in Japan as a church has been revoked, but many of its assets are unaccounted for.
Today, Aum Shinrikyo is once again soliciting donations, collecting tithes, selling materials to members, holding seminars, conducting training, and selling computers.
Active recruiting is under way.
Aum Shinrikyo is holding 50 educational seminars a month for current and potential members.
The cult has Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 515 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue offices throughout Japan, around Tokyo and other cities, and, according to Japanese sources, they maintain 100 hide-outs throughout that country as safe houses.
These sources estimate that at least 700 members are live-in, fully committed devotees.
Mind control is still a part of the cults package.
Cult members can be seen in Aum-owned houses wearing bizarre electric headsets, supposedly designed to synchronize their brain waves with those of the cults leader.
What is the message that these events to impart policy-makers? The objective of the Tokyo subway attack was not irrational.
The objective that day was to kill as many policemen as possible; Aum Shinrikyo had become aware of police plans to conduct raids against cult facilities, beginning on March 20.
The cults timetable could not permit that interruption.
Aums actions were perfectly logical within the context of their value system.
They were a self-legitimized group that had rejected and, ultimately, felt obliged to confront society.
Outnumbered as they were by Japanese police and military might, one can argue that developing and even using an asymmetric capability was a logical consequence of their situation.
Unable to achieve their objective political powerthrough legitimate means, they determined that a preemptive strike was necessary.
Is Aum Shinrikyo a potential threat? Is Shoko Ashahara just the first of many, or has he been relegated to the scrap heap? These are open questions we will be forced to grapple with for many years to come.
Mr. Olson is adviser, consultant, and writer on high-technology terrorism, the threat of chemical and biological weapons, and the practical challenges of arms control; member of the Central Intelligences Nonproliferation Advisory Panel; guest lecturer on chemical and biological weapons terrorism at the Defense Nuclear Weapons School, Air War College, Naval War College, and U.S. Air Force Special Operations School, and an adjunct faculty member at George Washington University.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 516 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue The Prospect of Domestic Bioterrorism Jessica Stern Council on Foreign Relations, Washington, D.C., USA Would domestic terrorists use biological weapons?1 The conventional wisdom among experts has been that terrorists want a lot of people watching, not a lot of people dead and are unlikely to turn to weapons of mass destruction.2 A new school of thought proposes that improved technology has made biological attacks resulting in hundreds of thousands or millions of deaths all but inevitable.
While terrorists are increasingly interested in weapons of mass destruction, proponents of the latter view exaggerate the threat.
Using biological weapons to create mass casualties would require more than having biological agents in hand.
The terrorists would need to disseminate the agent, which presents technical and organizational obstacles that few domestic groups could surmount.
In addition, relatively few terrorists would want to kill millions of people, even if they could.
For most terrorists, the costs of escalation to biological weapons would seem to outweigh the benefits.
Most modern terrorists have had substantively rational goals, such as attaining national autonomy or establishing a government purportedly more representative of the peoples will.
Escalating to such frightening weapons would result in a massive government crackdown and could alienate the groups supporters.
Biological weapons are also dangerous to produce.
A number of Aum Shinrikyo members reportedly damaged their own health while working on biological agents.
Additionally, some terrorists may perceive moral constraints.3 Candidates for successful use of biological weapons represent the intersection of three sets: groups that want to use these weapons despite formidable political risks; groups that can acquire the agent and a dissemination device (however crude); and groups whose organizational structure enables them to deliver or disseminate the agent covertly.
The intersection of these sets is small but growing, especially for low-technology attacks such as contaminating food or disseminating biological agents in an enclosed space.
Major attacks are also becoming more likely.
In the sections that follow, we consider eroding motivational, technical, and organizational constraints.
Motivational Factors Getting Attention Some terrorists may turn to biological weapons because they believe it would attract more attention to their cause than conventional attacks.
Studies of perceived risk show an inexact correlation between scientists assessment of risk and the level of fear invoked by risky technologies and activities.4 Biological weapons are mysterious, unfamiliar, indiscriminate, uncontrollable, inequitable, and invisible, all characteristics associated with heightened fear.
Economic Terrorism Unlike conventional weapons, radiologic, chemical, and biological agents could be used to destroy crops, poison foods, or contaminate pharmaceutical products.
They could also be used to kill livestock.
(Conventional weapons could be used for the same purposes, albeit less efficiently.)
Terrorists might use these agents to Address for correspondence: Jessica Stern, Council on Foreign Relations, 1779 Massachusetts Ave.
NW, Washington, D.C. 20007, USA; fax: 202-986- 2984; e-mail: jessicas@alum.mit.edu.
1 This essay summarizes Jessica Stern, Terrorist Motivations and WMD, in Peter Lavoy, Scott Sagan, and Jim Wirtz, ed., Planning the Unthinkable, in press, 2000.
2 Brian Jenkins has made this statement about terrorists on numerous occasions.
For example, see Brian Michael Jenkins, International Terrorism: A New Mode of Conflict, in David Carlton and Carolo Schaerf, eds., International Terrorism and World Security (London: Croom Helm, 1975), 15.
On terrorists purported aim to harass, see Kenneth Waltz, Waltz Responds to Sagan, in Scott D. Sagan and Kenneth Waltz, The Spread of Nuclear Weapons: A Debate (New York: Norton, 1995), 94-96.
3 For examples, see Jessica Stern in Lavoy.
4 See for example Paul Slovic, Baruch Fischoff and Sarah Lichtenstein, Facts and Fears: Understanding Perceived Risk, in Richard Schwing and Walter Albers, eds., Societal Risk Assessment: How Safe is Safe Enough? (New York: Plenum Press, 1980), 181-216.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 517 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue attack corporations perceived to be icons of the target country, for example, by contaminating batches of Coca-Cola, Stolichnaya vodka, or Guinness stout.
Terrorists could attempt to disseminate anthrax with the explicit goal of imposing expensive clean-up costs on a target government.
Millenarianism The millenarian idea is that the present age is corrupt and that a new age will dawn after a cleansing apocalypse.
Only a lucky few (usually selected on the basis of adherence to doctrine or ritual) will survive the end of time and experience paradise.5 Some millenarians believe that the saved will have to endure the 7 years of violence and struggle of the apocalypse, and they want to be prepared.6
Shoko Asahara, leader of the doomsday cult that released sarin gas in the Tokyo subway in 1995, killing 12,
told his followers that in the coming conflict between good and evil they would have to fight with every available weapon.7 A similar belief system explains the attraction to survivalism by Identity Christians, white supremacists who believe in an imminent Armageddon.
Premillennial Tension Slight tension connected with the millennium presumably affects most people.
Many are concerned about the Y2K problem, the prospect that computer systems will malfunction or fail at the end of 1999.
Some fear the breakdown of airtraffic control systems and are planning to avoid traveling around January 1, 2000.
Others fear an accidental launch of Russian nuclear missiles due to malfunctioning computers.
Many are stockpiling food and medicine or will have extra cash on hand in case automated banking systems fail.
Some feel vague religious fears.
Members of antigovernment groups and religious cults are often vulnerable psychologically and appear to be especially affected by premillennial tension.
Larry Wayne Harris, a white supremacist and born-again Christian, predicts that the Y2K bug will cause a civil war in the United States and that after January 1, 2000, the government will be unable to deliver welfare checks and food stamps for at least 3 years.8 He predicts that biological attacks could be carried out by domestic groups fighting for their heritage, traditions, and communities, causing devastating plagues like those described in the Bibles Book of Revelation.9 He urges all U.S. citizens to prepare.
For some domestic groups, preparation involves stockpiling weapons and training to use them.
Exacting Revenge or Creating Chaos Politically motivated terrorists who desire to change societies rather than destroy them might avoid killing very large numbers of people because the political costs would exceed the benefits.10 Some terrorists, however, want to annihilate their enemies or demolish the societal order.
William Pierce, leader of the neo-Nazi organization National Alliance, aims to initiate a worldwide race war and establish an Aryan state.
We are in a war for the survival of our race, he explains, that ultimately we cannot win... except by killing our enemies...
Its a case of either we destroy them or they will destroy us, with no chance for compromise or armistice.11 Creating social chaos is thus a worthwhile objective in Pierces view.
Ramzi Yousef, organizer of the World Trade Center bombing, claimed he was exacting revenge against the United States.12 Osama bin Laden seems to have similar motives.
Mimicking God Terrorists hoping to create an aura of divine retribution might be attracted to biological agents.
The fifth plague used by God to punish the Pharaoh in the Bibles Book of Exodus was murrain, a group of cattle diseases that includes 5While millenarian doctrines are generally religiously based, some are not.
See Jean E. Rosenfeld, Pai Marire: Peace and Violence in a New Zealand Millenarian Tradition, Terrorism and Political Violence, 7, no. 3 (autumn 1995), 83.
6End Times Jitters, interview with Michael Barkun, Klanwatch Intelligence Report (summer 1997), 17.
7FBIS-SOV-97-09, 6 May 1997.
Source Moscow Trud, 6 May 1997, 1-2.
8Author Interview with Larry Wayne Harris, 9 February 1999.
9Testimony of Larry Wayne Harris, State of Ohio v. Stephen Michael Wharf.
10The nature of the constituency is a key variable here.
If the terrorists constituents see the targeted group as subhuman, or if terrorists have no clear constituency, political constraints against macro-terrorism are less likely to bind.
11Quotes from Klanwatch Intelligence Report (May 1996), 6-8.
12Gail Appleson, Bomb Mastermind Gets Life in US Prison, Reuters, 9 January 1997.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 518 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue anthrax.
In the fifth chapter of Samuel I, God turned against the Philistines and smote them with emerods.
Medical historians consider these emerods a symptom of bubonic plague.13 Some terrorists may believe they are emulating God by employing these agents.
The Aura of Science Terrorists may want to impress their target audience with high technology or with weapons that appear more sophisticated than conventional ones.
Terrorists may find technology appealing for various reasons.
William Pierce, who studied physics at California Institute of Technology, is interested in high-technology weapons.
In his novel The Turner Diaries, rightwing extremists use nuclear, chemical, biological, and radiologic weapons to take over the world.
Pierce believes he can attract more intelligent recruits to his organization over the Internet than through radio or leaflets.14 The Copycat Phenomenon Domestic extremists have shown greater interest in chemical and biological weapons in the last 5 years.
For example, in 1998, members of the Republic of Texas were convicted of threatening to assassinate with biological agents President Clinton, Attorney General Janet Reno, and other officials.15 In May 1995, 6 weeks after the Aum Shinrikyo incident on the Tokyo subway, Larry Wayne Harris bought three vials of Yersinia pestis, the bacterium that causes bubonic plague.
No law prohibited Harris or any other U.S. citizen from acquiring the agent.
The law has been tightened up since, although many fear it is still not restrictive enough.
The Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) Director Louis Freeh reports that a growing numberwhile 13 14 still smallof lone offender and extremist splinter elements of right wing groups have been identified as possessing or attempting to develop or use weapons of mass destruction.16 In February 1998, Harris boasted to an informant that he had enough military-grade anthrax to wipe out all of Las Vegas.
Eight bags marked biological had been found in the back of a car he and his accomplice were driving.17 Several days later, federal authorities learned that the anthrax Harris had brought to Las Vegas was a vaccine strain not harmful to human health.
Nevertheless, the incident frightened many people and sparked a proliferation of anthrax hoaxes and threats in the second half of 1998 continuing into 1999 by groups including Identity Christians and other antigovernment groups, extortionists, antiabortion activists, and presumed prochoice groups.
In many cases, the perpetrators motives were unknown, but some incidents appear to have been student pranks, demonstrating the extent to which the threat of anthrax has entered U.S. consciousness (Table).
Technical Factors With the end of the cold war and the breakup of the Soviet Union, weapons of mass destruction and their components have become easier to acquire.
Underpaid former Soviet weapons experts may be providing biological weapons and expertise to Iran.18 South African biological weapons scientists have offered their expertise to Libya.19 State-sponsored groups are most capable of overcoming technical barriers to mass-casualty attacks, but the sponsor would presumably weigh the risk for retaliation before supporting this type of terrorist attack.
Hans Zinsser, Rats, Lice and History (Boston: Little Brown and Company, 1963), 110.
Author interview with William Pierce, 22 April 1997.
15 Madeline Baro, FBI: Men Knew of Cactus Weapons, Threats, Associated Press/Corpus Christi Online, 27 October 1998; found at: http://www.callertimes.com/autoconv/newstexmex98/newstexmex57.html.
16 Statement for the Record of Louis J. Freeh, Director, Federal Bureau of Investigation, before the United States Senate Committee on Appropriations; Subcommittee for the Departments of Commerce, Justice, and State, the Judiciary, and Related Agencies; February 4, 1999.
17One informant said that Harris said he had military-grade anthrax.
Another said Harris referred to a vaccine or a placebo.
Proceedings before the Regular Federal Grand Jury, Testimony of Robert James, February 25, 1998, United States District Court, District of Nevada, p. 17.
United States of America v. Larry Wayne Harris, Complete Transcript of Proceedings, CR-295-093, March 6, 1998, United States District Court, Southern District of Ohio.
18Judith Miller and William J. Broad, Bio-Weapons in Mind, Iranians Lure Needy Ex-Soviet Scientists, New York Times, 8 November 1998, A1 and Miller and Broad, Germ Weapons: In Soviet Past or in the New Russias Future? New York Times, 28 December 1998, A1.
19James Adams, Gadaffi Lures South Africas Top Germ Warfare Scientists, Sunday Times, 26 February 1995; Paul Taylor, Toxic S. African Arms Raise Concern; US Wants Assurance 80s Program is Dead, Washington Post, 28 February 1995.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 519 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Table.
Anthrax incidents in the United States, 19921999 No. incidents No. persons affectedb Persons decontaminated, treated, or quarantinedb Targets 1992 1 20 20 Residence a 1997 1 100 30 Year 1998 37 5,529 1,202 Government buildings and officials, individuals, clinics, religious instiutions, antiabortion activists, financial institutions, schools, retail establishments, office buildings, media, nightclub Antigovernment, alleged research, antiabortion, prochoice retaliation, student pranks, delay court appearance Dispersal on premises, modified cigarette lighter, moist towelettes, mail (envelope), explosive device, ventilation systems On-site inspection, evaluation perimeter sealed, pamphlets provided, quarantine, decontamination, medical treatment Religious organization Purported motivators Malicious Anti-Semitism Dissemination technique(s) Splattering Mail Responses Perimeter sealed, medical treatment Perimeter sealed, decontamination, medical treatment aThese data are years.
Data not bFigures do not Chart prepared presumed incomplete and may contain errors.
Numbers are based on press reports and are not available for all independently confirmed.
include incidents in which numbers are not available; actual totals, therefore, may be understated.
by Darcy Bender.
College-trained chemists and biologists could presumably produce biological agents, although they might have trouble disseminating them as aerosols.
Microorganisms can be disseminated by air in two forms: as liquid slurries or as dry powders.
While producing liquid slurries is relatively easy, disseminating them as respirable infectious aerosols over large open areas is not.
Although dry powders can be disseminated far more easily, high-quality powders require substantial development, involving skilled personnel and sophisticated equipment.
Milling biological agents would require a level of sophistication unlikely to be found among many domestic terrorist groups.
Far more likely are low-technology incidents such as contaminating foods, poisoning livestock, or disseminating industrial poisons in an enclosed space.
Such attacks could still be lethal.
Major attacks cannot be ruled out; however, governments need to prepare.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 520 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue biological agents act on their own or in small, secretive groups, FBI may have difficulty apprehending them.
One of CSAs objectives was to establish a computerized, nationwide system linking rightwing groups.
This goal has been achieved, although CSA is not exclusivelyor even principallyresponsible for this achievement.
The nationwide linking of right-wing groups has implications that have not been adequately appreciated by the law enforcement community.
The Internet makes terrorist acts easier to carry out.
It facilitates leaderless resistance by allowing leaders of the movement to communicate with sympathizers worldwide without having to meet face-to-face with their followers.
Organizational Factors In the mid-1980s, a little-known survivalist group called The Covenant, the Sword, and the Arm of the Lord (CSA) acquired a large drum of cyanide with the intention of poisoning water supplies in major U.S. cities.
At the time, CSA was unusual among terrorist groups in that its sole objective was large-scale murder rather than influencing government policies.
CSA overcame two of three large obstacles to successful employment of a chemical agent.
It had the motivation to use a chemical agent to kill large numbers and no political or moral constraints.
The group had acquired a chemical agent, although not in sufficient quantity to contaminate city water supplies.
The groups leaders had not recruited technically trained personnel and chose an unworkable dissemination technique.
Moreover, the group lacked discipline and was easily penetrated by FBI.
It is unlikely that CSA would make such mistakes if it were operating today, when antigovernment groups are so much more aware of the potential of poison weapons for inflicting mass casualties.20 CSA was run as a relatively open compound.
Some members wrote articles in local papers espousing antigovernment beliefs, and some worked in neighboring towns.
Several former CSA members became informants, often because they hoped to get their sentences reduced for other, unrelated, crimes.
In recent years, however, antigovernment groups have become more aware of the danger of penetration by lawenforcement authorities and have devised a new way of organizing themselves called leaderless resistance.21 Members are encouraged to act on their own, minimizing their communication with the leadership of the movement.
Timothy McVeigh operated according to this model.
His bombing of the Oklahoma City Federal Building was originally conceived of by CSA, although it is not clear that McVeigh knew of CSAs earlier plot.
If future terrorists with chemical or The Likeliest Perpetrators A small but growing number of domestic terrorists could attempt to use biological weapons in the belief that doing so would advance their goals.
The most likely are religious and extreme right-wing groups and groups seeking revenge who view secular rulers and the law they uphold as illegitimate.
They are unconstrained by fear of government or public backlash, since their actions are carried out to please God and themselves, not to impress a secular constituency.
Frequently, they do not claim credit for their attacks since their ultimate objective is to create so much fear and chaos that the governments legitimacy is destroyed.
Their victims are often viewed as subhuman since they are outside the groups religion or race.
Religiously motivated groups are increasing.
Of 11 international terrorist groups identified by the Rand Corporation in 1968, none were classified as religiously motivated.
By 1994, a third of the 49 international groups recorded in the Rand-St. Andrews Chronology were classified as religious.22 Religious groups are not only becoming more common; they are also more violent than secular groups.
In 1995, religious groups committed only 25% of the international incidents but caused 58% of the deaths.23 20For example, Kerry Noble claimed that if CSA leader James Ellison met someone who knew something about biological agents, he might consider using them.
Author interview with Kerry Noble, March 2, 1998.
21See Louis Beam, Leaderless Resistance, The Seditionist, Issue 12, February 1992.
Found at: http://www.louisbeam.com/ leaderless.htm.
22Bruce Hoffman, Viewpoint: Terrorism and WMD: Some Preliminary Hypotheses, Nonproliferation Review (spring-summer 1997): 45-52.
Hoffman provides slightly different numbers in Holy Terror: The Implications of Terrorism Motivated by a Religious Imperative (Santa Monica: Rand Corporation, P-7834, 1993).
23Hoffman, Viewpoint, 48.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 521 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Identity Christians believe that the Book of Revelation is to be taken literally as a description of future events.
Many evangelical Protestants believe in a doctrine of rapture: that the saved will be lifted off the earth to escape the apocalypse that will precede the Second Coming of Christ.
Followers of Christian Identity (and some other millenarian sects), however, expect to be present during the apocalypse.24 Because of this belief, some followers of Christian Identity believe they need to be prepared with every available weapon to ensure their survival.
Organizational pressures could induce some groups to commit extreme acts of violence.
Followers tend to be more interested in violence for its own sake than in the groups purported goals, making them less inhibited by moral or political constraints than the leaders.
Leaders may have difficulty designing command and control procedures that work.
Offshoots of established groups may be particularly dangerous.
Groups may also become most violent when the state is closing in on them, potentially posing difficulties for those fighting terrorism.
Another factor is the nature of the leader.
Charismatic leaders who isolate their followers from the rest of society often instill extreme paranoia among their followers.
Such groups can be susceptible to extreme acts of violence.
Asked who he thought the most likely domestic perpetrators of biological terrorism were, John Trochman, a leader of the Montana Militia, said that extremist offshoots of Identity Christian groups are possible candidates, as are disaffected military officers.25 Some antigovernment groups are attempting to recruit inside the U.S. military.26 William Pierce also foresees the use of biological weapons by antigovernment groups.
People disaffected by the government include not only the kind of people capable of making pipe bombs.
Bioweapons are more accessible than are nuclear weapons.27 Conclusions Terrorism with biological weapons is likely to remain rare.
This is especially the case for attacks intended to create mass casualties, which require a level of technologic sophistication likely to be possessed by few domestic groups.
While state-sponsored groups are most likely to be capable of massive biological weapons attacks, the state sponsor would presumably have to weigh the risk for retaliation.
As in the case of other low-probability high-cost risks, however, governments cannot ignore this danger; the potential damage is unacceptably high.
Because the magnitude of the threat is so difficult to calculate, however, it makes sense to focus on dual-use remedies: pursuing medical countermeasures that will improve public health in general, regardless of whether major biological attacks ever occur.
This would include strengthening the international system of monitoring disease outbreaks in humans, animals, and plants and developing better pharmaceutical drugs.
The risk for overreaction must be considered.
If authorities are not prepared in advance, they will be more susceptible to taking actions they will later regret, such as revoking civil liberties.
Attacks employing biological agents are also more likely and will be far more destructive if governments are caught unprepared.
Acknowledgments I thank Darcy Bender for research assistance and Peter Lavoy, Scott Sagan, and James Wirtz for comments.
Dr. Stern is a Fellow at the Council on Foreign Relations.
She is the author of The Ultimate Terrorists (Harvard University Press, 1999).
She is currently writing a book on religious extremism worldwide.
24 25 26 27 Author Author Author Author interview interview interview interview with with with with Pastor Millar, 21 April 1998.
Trochman, 9 February 1999.
William Pierce, 22 April 1997.
William Pierce.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 522 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Potential Biological Weapons Threats Mark G. Kortepeter and Gerald W. Parker U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases, Fort Detrick, Maryland, USA The list of agents that could pose the greatest public health risk in the event of a bioterrorist attack is short.
However, although short, the list includes agents that, if acquired and properly disseminated, could cause a difficult public health challenge in terms of our ability to limit the numbers of casualties and control the damage to our cities and nation.
The use of biological weapons has occurred sporadically for centuries, culminating in sophisticated research and testing programs run by several countries.
Biological weapons proliferation is a serious problem that is increasing the probability of a serious bioterrorism incident.
The accidental release of anthrax from a military testing facility in the former Soviet Union in 1979 and Iraqs admission in 1995 to having quantities of anthrax, botulinum toxin, and aflatoxin ready to use as weapons have clearly shown that research in the offensive use of biological agents continued, despite the 1972 Biological Weapons Convention (1,2).
Of the seven countries listed by the U.S. Department of State as sponsoring international terrorism (3), at least five are suspected to have biological warfare programs.
There is no evidence at this time, however, that any state has provided biological weapons expertise to a terrorist organization (4).
A wide range of groups or individuals might use biological agents as instruments of terror.
At the most dangerous end of the spectrum are large organizations that are well-funded and possibly state-supported.
They would be expected to cause the greatest harm, because of their access to scientific expertise, biological agents, and most importantly, dissemination technology, including the capability to produce refined dry agent, deliverable in milled particles of the proper size for aerosol dissemination.
The Address for correspondence: Mark G. Kortepeter, Operational Medicine Division, U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases, Fort Detrick, MD 21702-5011, USA; fax: 301-619-2312; e-mail: Mark_Kortepeter@DET.AMEDD.
ARMY.MIL.
Aum Shinrikyo in Japan is an example of a wellfinanced organization that was attempting to develop biological weapons capability.
However, they were not successful in their multiple attempts to release anthrax and botulinum toxin (4).
On this end of the spectrum, the list of biological agents available to cause mass casualties is small and would probably include one of the classic biological agents.
The probability of occurrence is low; however, the consequences of a possible successful attack are serious.
Smaller, less sophisticated organizations may or may not have the intent to kill but may use biological pathogens to further their specific goals.
The Rajhneeshees, who attempted to influence local elections in The Dalles, Oregon, by contaminating salad bars with Salmonella Typhimurium, are an example (5).
Rather than having a sophisticated research program, these organizations could use biological pathogens that are readily available.
The third type are smaller groups or individuals who may have very limited targets (e.g., individuals or buildings) and are using biological pathogens in murder plots or to threaten havoc.
The recent anthrax hoaxes are examples of this.
Many biological agents could be used in such instances and the likelihood of their occurrence is high, but the public health consequences are low.
There are many potential human biological pathogens.
A North Atlantic Treaty Organization handbook dealing with biological warfare defense lists 39 agents, including bacteria, viruses, rickettsiae, and toxins, that could be used as biological weapons (6).
Examining the relationship between aerosol infectivity and toxicity versus quantity of agent illustrates the requirements for producing equivalent effects and narrows the spectrum of possible agents that could be used to cause large numbers of casualities.
For example, the amount of agent needed to cover a 100-km2 area and cause 50% Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 523 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue lethality is 8 metric tons for even a highly toxic toxin such as ricin versus only kilogram quantities of anthrax needed to achieve the same coverage.
Thus, deploying an agent such as ricin over a wide area, although possible, becomes impractical from a logistics standpoint, even for a well-funded organization (7).
The potential impact on a city can be estimated by looking at the effectiveness of an aerosol in producing downwind casualties.
The World Health Organization in 1970 modeled the results of a hypothetical dissemination of 50 kg of agent along a 2-km line upwind of a large population center.
Anthrax and tularemia are predicted to cause the highest number of dead and incapacitated, as well as the greatest downwind spread (8).
For further indication of which pathogens make effective biological weapons, one could look at the agents studied by the United States when it had an offensive biological weapons research program.
Under that program, which was discontinued in 1969, the United States produced the following to fill munitions: Bacillus anthracis, botulinum toxin, Francisella tularensis, Brucella suis, Venezuelan equine encephalitis virus, staphylococcal enterotoxin B, and Coxiella burnetti (9).
As a further indication of which pathogens have the requisite physical characteristics to make good biological weapons, one need only look next at the agents that former Soviet Union biological weapons experts considered likely candidates.
The agents included smallpox, plague, anthrax, botulinum toxin, equine encephalitis viruses, tularemia, Q fever, Marburg, melioidosis, and typhus (10,11).
Criteria such as infectivity and toxicity, environmental stability, ease of large-scale production, and disease severity were used in determining which agents had a high probability of use.
Both the United States before 1969 and the former Soviet Union spent years determining which pathogens had strategic and tactical capability.
The National Defense University recently compiled a study of more than 100 confirmed incidents of illicit use of biological agents during this century (W.S. Carus, pers. comm. [4]).
Of the 100 incidents, 29 involved agent acquisition, and of the 29, 19 involved the actual nongovernmental use of an agent, and most were used for biocrimes, rather than for bioterrorism.
In the context of this study, the distinguishing feature of bioterrorism is that it involves the use of violence on behalf of a political, religious, ecologic, or other ideologic cause without reference to the moral or political justice of the cause.
The balance of incidents involved an expressed interest, threat of use, or an attempt to acquire an agent.
In the 1990s, incidents increased markedly, but most have been hoaxes.
The pathogens involved present a wide spectrum, from those with little ability to cause disease or disability, such as Ascaris suum, to some of the familiar agents deemed most deadly, such as B. anthracis, ricin, plague, and botulinum toxins (Table).
During this period, the number of known deaths is only 10, while the total number of casualties is 990.
However, the numbers should not give a false sense of security that mass lethality is not achievable by a determined terrorist group.
The sharp increase in biological threats, hoaxes, information, and Internet sources on this subject seen in recent years indicates a growing interest in the possible use of biological pathogens for nefarious means (4).
In general, the existing public health systems should be able to handle most attempts to release biological pathogens.
A working group organized by the Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies recently looked at potential biological agents to decide which present the greatest risk for a maximum credible event from a public health perspective.
A maximum credible event would be one that could cause large loss of life, in addition to disruption, panic, and overwhelming of the civilian healthcare resources (12).
To be used for a maximum credible event, an agent must have some of the following properties: the agent should be highly lethal and easily produced in large quantities.
Given that the aerosol route is the most likely for a largescale attack, stability in aerosol and capability to be dispersed (1 �m to 5 �m particle size) are necessary.
Additional attributes that make an agent even more dangerous include being communicable from person to person and having no treatment or vaccine.
When the potential agents are reviewed for these characteristics, anthrax and smallpox are the two with greatest potential for mass casualties and civil disruption.
1) Both are highly lethal: the death rate for anthrax if untreated before onset of serious symptoms exceeds 80%; 30% of unvaccinated patients infected with Emerging Infectious Diseases 524 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Table 1.
Biological agents involved in bioterrorism or biocrimesa Traditional biological warfare agents Pathogens Bacillus anthracisb Brucella suis Coxiella burnetiib Francisella tularensis Smallpox Viral encephalitides Viral hemorrhagic fevers Yersinia pestisb b Toxins Botulinumb Ricinb Staphylococcal enterotoxin B Anti-crop agents Rice blast Rye stem rust Wheat stem rust Agents associated with biocrimes and bioterrorism Ascaris suum Bacillus anthracisb Coxiella burnetiib Giardia lamblia HIV Rickettsia prowazekii (typhus) Salmonella Typhimurium Salmonella typhi Shigella species Schistosoma species Vibrio cholerae Viral hemorrhagic fevers (Ebola)b Yellow fever virus Yersinia enterocolitica Yersinia pestisb Botulinumb Cholera endotoxin Diphtheria toxin Nicotine Ricinb Snake toxin Tetrodotoxin aIncludes agents which were used, acquired, attempted to acquire, involved in a threat of use or an expressed interest in using.
Reprinted with permission from Carus WS. Table 6: Biological agents involved.
In: Carus WS. Bioterrorism and biocrimes: the illicit use of biological agents in the 20th Century.
Working Paper, Center for Counterproliferation Research, National Defense University.
August 1998, revised March 1999.
bThese agents appear on both lists.
variola major could die.
2) Both are stable for transmission in aerosol and capable of largescale production.
Anthrax spores have been known to survive for decades under the right conditions (13).
WHO was concerned that smallpox might be freeze-dried to retain virulence for prolonged periods (8).
3) Both have been developed as agents in state programs.
Iraq has produced anthrax for use in Scud missiles and conducted research on camelpox virus, which is closely related to smallpox (2).
A Soviet defector has reported that the former Soviet Union produced smallpox virus by the ton (11).
4) Use of either agent would have a devastating psychological effect on the target population, potentially causing widespread panic.
This is in part due to the agents well-demonstrated historical potential to cause large disease outbreaks (14).
5) Initial recognition of both diseases is likely to be delayed.
For anthrax, this is secondary to the rare occurrence of inhalation anthrax.
Only 11 cases of inhalation anthrax have been reported in the United States from 1945 to 1994 (15), and recognition may be delayed until after antibiotic use would be beneficial.
For smallpox, given that few U.S. physicians have any clinical experience with the disease, many could confuse it for more common diseases (e.g., varicella and bullous erythema multiforme) early on, allowing for secondgeneration spread (12,16).
6) Availability of vaccines for either disease is limited.
Anthrax vaccine, licensed in 1970, has been used for persons at high risk for contact with this disease.
The U.S. military has recently begun vaccinating the entire force; however, there is limited availability of the vaccine for use in the civilian population.
Routine smallpox vaccination was Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 525 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue discontinued in the United States in 1971.
Recent estimates of the current number of doses in storage at CDC range from 5 to 7 million (12), but the viability of stored vaccine is no longer guaranteed.
Obtaining smallpox virus as opposed to other agents (e.g., anthrax, plague, and botulinum toxin) would be difficult, but if obtained and intentionally released, smallpox could cause a public health catastrophe because of its communicability.
Even a single case could lead to 10 to 20 others.
It is estimated that no more than 20% of the population has any immunity from prior vaccination (12).
There is no acceptable treatment, and the communicability by aerosol requires negative-pressure isolation.
Therefore, these limited isolation resources in medical facilities would be easily overwhelmed.
Anthrax can have a delayed onset, further leading to delays in recognition and treatment.
In the outbreak of inhalation anthrax in Sverdlovsk in 1979, some patients became ill up to 6 weeks after the suspected release of anthrax spores (1).
The current recommendation for prophylaxis of persons exposed to aerosolized anthrax is treatment with antibiotics for 8 weeks in the absence of vaccine or 4 weeks and until three doses of vaccine have been given (17).
The amount of antibiotics required for postexposure prophylaxis of large populations could be enormous and could easily tax logistics capabilities for consequence management.
Other bacterial agents capable of causing a maximum credible event include plague and tularemia.
Plague, like smallpox and anthrax, can decimate a population (as in Europe in the Middle Ages).
An outbreak of plague could easily cause great fear and hysteria in the target population (as in the 1994 outbreak in India), when hundreds of thousands were reported to have fled the city of Surat, various countries embargoed flights to and from India, and importation of Indian goods was restricted (18).
Both plague and tularemia are potentially lethal without proper treatment; however, the availability of effective treatment and prophylaxis may reduce possible damage to a population.
Both are infectious at low doses.
Pneumonic plagues person-to-person communicability and untreated case-fatality rate of at least twice that of tularemia make it more effective than tularemia as an agent to cause mass illness.
Other agents of concern include the botulinum toxins and viral hemorrhagic fevers.
Once again, both are highly lethal.
Botulinum toxin is a commonly cited threat, and Iraq has admitted to producing it.
Since intensive care would be required in treating both illnesses and ventilator management is life-saving for botulinum, both would easily tax existing medical care facilities.
However, botulinum toxin may be a less effective agent because of relatively lower stability in the environment and smaller geographic coverage than other agents demonstrated in modeling studies.
Producing and dispensing large amounts are also difficult (W.C. Patrick, pers. comm.,19).
A number of different viruses can cause hemorrhagic fever.
These include (but are not limited to) Lassa fever, from the Arenaviridae family; Rift Valley fever and Crimean Congo hemorrhagic fever, from the Bunyaviridae family; and Ebola hemorrhagic fever and Marburg disease, from the Filoviridae family.
These organisms are potential biological agents because of their lethality, high infectivity by the aerosol route shown in animal models, and possibility for replication in tissue culture (16).
In summary, we know that biological pathogens have been used for biological warfare and terrorism, and their potential for future use is a major concern.
Therefore we must be prepared to respond appropriately if they are used again.
The technology and intellectual capacity exist for a well-funded, highly motivated terrorist group to mount such an attack.
Although the list of potential agents is long, only a handful of pathogens are thought to have the ability to cause a maximum credible event to paralyze a large city or region of the country, causing high numbers of deaths, widescale panic, and massive disruption of commerce.
Diseases of antiquity (including anthrax, smallpox, and plague), notorious for causing large outbreaks, still head that list.
In addition, other agents, such as botulinum toxin, hemorrhagic fever viruses, and tularemia, have potential to do the same.
By focusing on a smaller list of these low-likelihood, but high-impact diseases, we can better prepare for potential intentional releases, and hope to mitigate their ultimate impact on our citizens.
Many other pathogens can cause illness and death, and the threat list will always be dynamic.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 526 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue We must, therefore, have the appropriate surveillance system and laboratory capability to identify other pathogens, and we must improve our public health and medical capabilities to respond to the short list of the most dangerous naturally occurring biological pathogens that could be used as bioterrorism weapons.
Dr. Kortepeter is a preventive medicine officer in the Operational Medicine Division at the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases, where he teaches the medical management of biological weapons casualties.
Dr. Parker is Commander, U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases (USAMRIID) at Fort Detrick, MD. USAMRIID conducts research to develop vaccines, medications, and diagnostics to protect U.S. service members from biological warfare threats and endemic infectious diseases.
8.
World Health Organization Group of Consultants.
Health aspects of chemical and biological weapons.
Geneva: The Organization; 1970.
9.
Department of the Army.
U.S. army activity in the U.S. biological warfare programs.
Vol II.
Publication DTIC B193427L.
Washington: The Department; 1977.
10.
Vorobjev AA, Cherkassey BL, Stepanov AV, Kyuregyan AA, Fjedorov YM. Key problems of controlling especially dangerous infections.
In: Proceedings of the International Symposium of Severe Infectious Diseases: Epidemiology, Express-Diagnostics and Prevention; 1997 Jun 16-20; Kirov, Russia.
State Scientific Institution, Volgo-Vyatsky Center of Applied Biotechnology; 1997.
11.
Alibek K, Handelman S. Biohazard.
Random House.
New York, NY; 1999.
12.
Henderson DA.
The looming threat of bioterrorism.
Science 1999;283:1279-82.
13.
Manchee RJ, Stewart WDP.
The decontamination of Gruinard Island.
Chemistry in Britain 1988;690-1.
14.
The Holy Bible, new international version.
Exodus Chapter 9.
Indianapolis and Grand Rapids: B.B. Kirkbride Bible Company, Inc. and The Zondervan Corporation; 1978.
15.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
Summary of notifiable diseases, 1945-1994.
MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 1994;43:70-8.
16.
Franz DR, Jahrling PB, Friedlander AM, McClain DJ, Hoover DL, Byrne WR, et al.
Clinical recognition and management of patients exposed to biological warfare agents.
JAMA 1997;278:399-411.
17.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
Bioterrorism alleging use of anthrax and interim guidelines for managementUnited States, 1998.
MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 1999;48:69-74.
18.
Campbell GL, Hughes JM. Plague in India: a new warning from an old nemesis.
Ann Intern Med 1995;122:151-3.
19.
McNally RE, Morrison MB, Berndt JE, Fisher JE, BoBerry JT, Puckett V, et al.
Effectiveness of medical defense interventions against predicted battlefield levels of botulinum toxin A. Joppa (MD): Science Applications International Corporation; 1994.
References 1.
Meselson M, Gillemin J, Hugh-Jones M, Langmuir A, Popova I, Shelokov A, et al.
The Sverdlovsk anthrax outbreak of 1979.
Science 1994;209:1202-8.
2.
Zilinskas RA. Iraqs biological weapons: the past as future? JAMA 1997;278:418-24.
3.
U.S. Department of State.
1996 Patterns of Global Terrorism Report.
Available from: URL: http:// www.state.gov.
4.
Carus WS. Bioterrorism and biocrimes: the illicit use of biological agents in the 20th Century [working paper].
Washington: Center for Counterproliferation Research, National Defense University; Aug 1998, revised Mar 1999.
5.
Torok TJ, Tauxe RV, Wise RP, Livengood JR, Sokolow R, Mauvais S, et al.
A large community outbreak of salmonellosis caused by intentional contamination of restaurant salad bars.
JAMA 1997;278:389-95.
6.
Departments of the Army, Navy, and Air Force.
NATO Handbook on the Medical Aspects of NBC Defensive Operations.
Washington: The Department; 1996.
7.
Spertzel RO, Wannemacher RW, Patrick WC, Linden CD, Franz DR. Technical ramifications of inclusion of toxins in the chemical weapons convention (CWC).
Technical report no.
MR-43-92-1.
Fort Detrick (MD): U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases; 1992.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 527 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Epidemiology of Bioterrorism Julie A. Pavlin Walter Reed Army Institute of Research, Washington, D.C., USA Since the discovery of Iraqs biological weapons program, concern regarding the threat of biological warfare has increased (1).
Anthrax immunizations; increased nuclear, biological, and chemical defense training; improved detection systems and protective gear; and increased vigilance have been instituted to protect the military.
However, the military is not the only population at risk for biological attack.
To effectively counter the potentially devastating effects of an attack, we need to understand the basic epidemiologic principles of biological agents used as weapons.
A biological agent is commonly portrayed as a genetically engineered organism resistant to all known vaccines and drugs, highly contagious, and able to harm thousands of people.
However, alleged attacks by the Aum Shinrikyo did not result in a single illness from a biological agent (2), and the successful 1984 contamination of salad bars in The Dalles, Oregon, by a religious cult involved a common salmonella strain that was not lethal or contagious and was susceptible to antibiotics (3).
Therefore, our level of suspicion and diligence in identifying and reacting to a biological attack must remain high, since the attack may not follow an expected pattern.
Furthermore, a small outbreak of illness could be an early warning of a more serious attack, and recognition and prompt institution of preventive measures (such as effective vaccines and antibiotics) could save thousands of lives.
To facilitate the rapid identification of a bioterrorist attack, all health-care providers and public health personnel should have basic epidemiologic skills and knowledge of what to expect in such a setting.
Differential Diagnosis Any small or large outbreak of disease should be evaluated as a potential bioterrorist attack.
This initial investigation does not have to be time consuming or involve law enforcement.
A look at the facts surrounding the outbreak to determine if anything seems unusual or indicative of bioterrorism should suffice.
Since a disease outbreak can be the result of intentional contamination, the differential diagnosis of an outbreak should first be considered.
The possibilities include a spontaneous outbreak of a known endemic disease, a spontaneous outbreak of a new or reemerging disease, a laboratory accident, or an intentional attack with a biological agent.
Epidemiologic tools can assist in differentiating between these possibilities.
The cause of a disease or even the occurrence of something unusual may be very difficult to determine, especially if the initial cases are few.
Surveillance needs to be more than routine.
Not only unusually high rates of illness but also unusual diseases should signal a warning.
For example, even one case of inhalation anthrax should cause immediate concern and action.
Unlike chemical terrorism, biological terrorism is not immediately obvious but may appear insidiously, with primary-care providers witnessing the first cases.
However, it may not even be emergency room personnel who first detect a problem.
The first to notice could be a hospital laboratory seeing unusual strains of organisms, or the county epidemiologist keeping track of hospital admissions, or even pharmacists distributing more antibiotics than usual, 911 operators noticing an increase in respiratory distress calls, or funeral directors with increased business.
All epidemiologic data should be tracked and aggressively followed to ensure the most rapid recognition and response.
Address for correspondence: Julie A. Pavlin, Department of Field Studies, Division of Preventive Medicine, Walter Reed Army Institute of Research, Washington, D.C. 20307-5100, USA; fax: 202-782-0613; e-mail: pavlinj@wrsmtp-ccmail.army.mil.
Epidemiologic Approach The basic epidemiologic approach in the evaluation of a potential bioterrorist or biowarfare attack is not different from any Emerging Infectious Diseases 528 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue standard epidemiologic investigation.
The first step is to use laboratory and clinical findings to confirm that a disease outbreak has occurred.
A case definition should be constructed to determine the number of cases and the attack rate.
The use of objective criteria in the development of a case definition is very important in determining an accurate case number, as both additional cases may be found and some may be excluded, especially as the potential exists for hysteria to be confused with actual disease.
The estimated rate of illness should be compared with rates during previous years to determine if the rate constitutes a deviation from the norm.
Once the case definition and attack rate have been determined, the outbreak can be characterized in the conventional context of time, place, and person.
These data will provide crucial information in determining the potential source of the outbreak.
exposure.
From this information, a possible incubation period can be calculated, which can assist in determining the potential cause of illness, as well as suggesting a possible intentional attack (if the incubation period is shorter than usual as a result of an unusually high inoculum or more effective exposure route).
Calculating the incubation period may also help determine if the disease is spread from person to person, which is extremely important to effective disease control measures.
Epidemiologic Clues As steep epidemic curves can be seen in natural point-source exposures, additional characteristics of the outbreak should be investigated in determining whether it is the result of a biological attack (4,5).
None of the following clues alone constitute proof of intentional use of a biological agent, but together they can assist greatly in determining if further investigation is warranted.
1) The presence of a large epidemic, with greater case loads than expected, especially in a discrete population.
2) More severe disease than expected for a given pathogen, as well as unusual routes of exposure, such as a preponderance of inhalational disease as was seen in Sverdlovsk after the accidental release of aerosolized Bacillus anthracis spores (6).
3) A disease that is unusual for a given geographic area, is found outside the normal transmission season, or is impossible to transmit naturally in the absence of the normal vector for transmission.
4) Multiple simultaneous epidemics of different diseases.
5) A disease outbreak with zoonotic as well as human consequences, as many of the potential threat agents are pathogenic to animals.
6) Unusual strains or variants of organisms or antimicrobial resistance patterns disparate from those circulating.
7) Higher attack rates in those exposed in certain areas, such as inside a building if the agent was released indoors, or lower rates in those inside a sealed building if an aerosol was released outdoors.
8) Intelligence that an adversary has access to a particular agent or agents.
9) Claims by a terrorist of the release of a biologic agent.
10) Direct evidence of the release of an agent, with findings of equipment, munitions, or tampering.
Even with the presence of more than one of the above indicators, it may not be easy to determine that an attack occurred through Epidemic Curve Using data gathered on cases over time, an epidemic curve can be calculated.
The disease pattern is an important factor in differentiating between a natural outbreak and an intentional attack.
In most naturally occurring outbreaks, numbers of cases gradually increase as a progressively larger number of people come in contact with other patients, fomites, and vectors that can spread disease.
Eventually, most of the population has been exposed and is immune to further disease, and the number of cases, or epidemic curve, gradually decreases.
Conversely, a bioterrorism attack is most likely to be caused by a point source, with everyone coming in contact with the agent at approximately the same time.
The epidemic curve in this case would be compressed, with a peak in a matter of days or even hours, even with physiologic and exposure differences.
If the biological agent is contagious, it is possible to see a second curve peak after the first, as original cases expose originally unexposed persons to the agent.
The steep epidemic curve expected in a bioterrorism attack is similar to what would be seen with other point source exposures, such as foodborne outbreaks.
Therefore, the compressed epidemic curve is still not pathognomonic for an intentional bioterrorism attack.
If a specific group has been exposed, the epidemic curve may indicate the time of Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 529 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue nefarious means.
For example, it took months to determine that the outbreak of salmonellosis in Oregon was caused by intentional contamination of salad bars (3).
Other outbreaks, such as the hantavirus outbreak in the Four Corners area of the United States, have been thought of as possible results of intentional contamination (7).
Even if no conclusive answer can be derived quickly, the means employed in determining the cause of an attack will still provide medical personnel with information that may prevent illness and death.
further exposure, which should be the key driving force behind any epidemiologic investigation.
Through strong epidemiologic training, a close attention to disease patterns, and a healthy respect for the threat of biological terrorism, potential problems can be discovered rapidly, and actions can be taken to decrease the impact of disease, regardless of its origin.
Major Pavlin is chief of the Field Studies Department, Division of Preventive Medicine, Walter Reed Army Institute of Research.
She has worked in the area of medical biodefense education.
Currently she is developing national and international surveillance systems for emerging diseases with the Department of Defenses Global Emerging Infections Surveillance and Response System.
Recommendations for Preparedness Improved awareness and readiness should a bioterrorism attack occur include education of all medical personnel, especially primary-care providers and emergency personnel first to see patients affected by a biological attack.
Training should include basic epidemiologic principles as well as clinical information on diagnosing and treating agents that pose the highest threat.
Training should be refreshed periodically to ensure that skills remain current.
Improved surveillance efforts should be instituted with as close to real-time data gathering as possible.
All facets of surveillance should be used, to include emergency visits, laboratory data, pharmacy use, school absenteeism, or any other data that correlate with an increase in infectious disease.
Robust surveillance systems are essential to detecting any emerging or reemerging disease.
Quick recognition of any change in disease patterns will facilitate determining the source and preventing References 1.
Proliferation: threat and response.
Office of the Secretary of Defense; November 1997.
2.
Broad WJ, Miller J.
The threat of germ weapons is rising.
Fear, too.
New York Times 1998 Dec 27; sec. 4, col. 1, pg. 1.
3.
Torok TJ, Tauxe RV, Wise RP, Livengood JR, Sokolow R, Mauvais S, et al.
A large community outbreak of salmonellosis caused by intentional contamination of restaurant salad bars.
JAMA 1997;278:389-95.
4.
Weiner SL.
Strategies of biowarfare defense.
Mil Med 1987;152:25-8.
5.
Noah DL, Sobel AL, Ostroff SM, Kildew JA. Biological warfare training: infectious disease outbreak differentiation criteria.
Mil Med 1998;163:198-201.
6.
Meselson M, Guillemin J, Hugh-Jones M, Langmuir A, Popova I, Shelokov A, et al.
The Sverdlovsk anthrax outbreak of 1979.
Science 1994;266:1202-8.
7.
Horgan J. Were Four Corners victims biowar casualties? Sci Am 1993;269:16.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 530 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Vaccines in Civilian Defense Against Bioterrorism Philip K. Russell Johns Hopkins School of Public Health, Baltimore, Maryland, USA In the United States, over the past half century, we have lived under the protective umbrella of vaccination programs that shield our population from a dozen serious and sometimes fatal naturally transmitted illnesses.
Vaccination has been the single most cost-effective public health intervention.
However, the value of vaccines in protecting the population against the deliberate release of infectious organisms is not so clear-cut.
The U.S. armed forces have recognized the military value of vaccines against biological threats and have a long-standing research and development program for a series of vaccines to protect service members from hostile use of a biological agent.
Vaccination against anthrax is under way in all three armed services.
The Department of Defense has a large program to develop and license additional vaccines for biological defense.
For the military, vaccination is an effective means of countering a known threat because the population at risk is easily defined and a high level of vaccine coverage can be achieved.
In evaluating the role of vaccines for protecting the civilian population, quite different answers are reached.
Despite the protective efficacy of vaccines against individual organisms, the very high costs and the great difficulties involved in vaccinating large populations, along with the broad spectrum of potential agents, make it impossible to use vaccines to protect the general population against bioterrorism.
Thus, vaccines cannot be considered a first line of defense against bioterrorism for the general population, as they can be for the relatively small military population.
However, if suitable vaccines can be made available, they have several potential uses: control of a smallpox Address for correspondence: Philip K. Russell, Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies, Candler Building, Suite 850, 111 Market Place, Baltimore, MD 21202, USA; fax: 410-223-1665; e-mail: biodefen@jhsph.edu. epidemic and prevention of a global pandemic, postexposure prophylaxis against anthrax (with antibiotics), and preexposure prophylaxis in first-responders at high risk, laboratory workers, and health-care providers.
Smallpox and anthrax, which pose the greatest risk for causing large numbers of casualties in the event of an effective release by a terrorist group, are at the top of the list of threat agents.
Licensed vaccines against both anthrax and smallpox that protect against aerosol transmission are available.
An existing licensed plague vaccine is protective against fleatransmitted disease but not against aerosol challenge in animal experiments or against pneumonic plague.
This vaccine is in limited supply, and the manufacturer has recently ceased production.
The Department of Defense Joint Vaccine Acquisition Program has several experimental vaccines in development (Table).
These vaccines will be further developed and tested with the intent of obtaining products licensed by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.
Table.
Vaccines against biological agents Licensed Vaccines in research vaccines and development Anthrax Vaccinia (cell culture) Smallpox (vaccinia) Botulinum toxoids Plague Tularemia Q fever VEE, EEE, WEE VEE, Venezuelan equine encephalitis; EEE, Eastern equine encephalitis; WEE, Western equine encephalitis.
Smallpox One vaccine in development that is of great importance to civilian biodefense is the vaccinia virus vaccine made in cell culture.
A new national stockpile of vaccinia vaccine is urgently needed to respond to the possible threat of a Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 531 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue deliberate release of smallpox virus.
Even though such release is unlikely, the consequences of being unprepared would be a global catastrophe.
An unchecked epidemic in todays unvaccinated, densely packed urban populations linked by rapid air travel could kill millions.
The only possible course of action would be to mount a global effort to control the spread and eradicate the disease using vaccinia virus vaccine.
The number of deaths due to secondary and subsequent spread of this highly contagious virus would be determined by the rapidity of the public health response, the effectiveness of a vaccination campaign, and, most importantly, the availability of vaccine.
The national stockpile (fewer than 7 million doses of vaccinia virus vaccine) is insufficient to meet national and international needs in this scenario.
The stockpile is also deteriorating and has a finite life span.
The vaccine was made using the traditional method of scarifying and infecting the flanks and bellies of calves and harvesting the infected lymph.
No manufacturer exists today with the capability to manufacture calf lymph vaccine by the traditional method.
Replacing the stockpile will require the development and licensure of a new vaccine using modern cell-culture methods.
This development program, which will include process development, validation of a new manufacturing process, and extensive clinical testing, will be expensive and may take several years (1).
Obstacles to the development of the vaccine include the lack of satisfactory stocks of vaccinia immune globulin necessary for managing complications of vaccination.
Clinical testing cannot proceed without a supply of vaccinia immune globulin.
As part of the development effort, the problems associated with manufacture of sufficient quantities of vaccinia immune globulin will have to be addressed and solved.
The Department of Defense program is moving ahead with development of a cell-culture vaccine by using a cloned strain of vaccinia derived from another strain.
Both civilian and military requirements could be met by a combined and expanded development effort using either the cloned strain or one of the licensed vaccinia strains.
The development costs will undoubtedly be high, as for any new biologic product, but the cost of preparedness is insignificant when weighed against the costs of an unchecked smallpox epidemic.
Anthrax Anthrax is the second threat that requires a major research and development effort to meet civilian needs.
A covert attack, which exposes an urban population to an anthrax spore aerosol, is thought by some to be the most likely scenario for a bioterrorism attack.
If the release is detected or the first cases are rapidly diagnosed, rapid action can save many lives.
Providing the exposed population with antibiotics followed by vaccination could be lifesaving for exposed persons who would otherwise become ill with untreatable inhalation anthrax in the subsequent few weeks.
Prophylactic antibiotics alone will prevent disease in persons exposed to antibioticsusceptible organisms, but incorporating vaccination into the treatment regime can greatly reduce the length of treatment with antibiotics.
Without vaccination, antibiotics must be continued for 60 days; if effective vaccination can be provided, this can be reduced to 30 days.
Vaccination of persons affected by an attack will also face the issue of environmental contamination of urban areas after an attack.
Stockpiling a vaccine capable of inducing protective immunity with two doses could be extremely valuable in reducing the impact of a terrorist release of anthrax.
The current anthrax vaccine manufactured by Bioport (formerly the Michigan Department of Public Health Laboratory) is an alumadsorbed, partially purified culture filtrate of Bacillus anthracis with a high protective antigen content.
The schedule for administration is 0, 2, and 4 weeks and 6, 12, and 18 months.
This vaccine is safe and efficacious and is being used by the armed forces to protect personnel against the use of anthrax as a weapon.
Immunization of rhesus monkeys followed by a high-dose aerosol challenge has convincingly demonstrated the capability of this vaccine to protect against aerosol challenge with B. anthracis spores.
The multiple dose requirement, however, is a drawback for civilian use.
Studies in progress may find ways to allow modification of the schedule.
Vaccine supply is limited, as is production capacity.
As a result, at least for the immediate future, the armed forces will require the entire available supply.
This vaccine is made by a method developed before the advent of molecular biology and requires dedicated facilities because B. anthracis is a spore-forming organism.
In addition to having a Emerging Infectious Diseases 532 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue multiple-dose requirement, the vaccine is not highly purified and contains multiple extraneous proteins.
The characteristics of the vaccine and the constraints on the present method of manufacturing argue strongly against procuring large amounts for civilian use when the technology and the science base exist to rapidly develop a second-generation, improved anthrax vaccine.
Anthrax depends on two toxins (lethal factor and edema factor) for virulence.
A protein called protective factor is an essential component of both toxins.
The protective factor content is the basis for the effectiveness of the current vaccine.
A vaccine based on purified protective factor made by recombinant technology has been protective in animals (2).
Use of a modern adjuvant with purified recombinant protective factor should make it possible to have a very effective two-dose vaccine.
A recent report of the Institute of Medicine Committee on Research and Development to Improve Civilian Medical Response to Chemical and Biological Terrorism makes a strong case for a major research and development effort leading to an improved second-generation vaccine (1).
Questions regarding the ability of existing anthrax vaccines to protect against anthrax strains engineered to contain additional virulence genes have been raised in Russia (3).
Research is needed to address this and related questions about the pathogenesis of anthrax and protective immunity.
The value of vaccinating law-enforcement and emergency response personnel, who must respond to threats (real or otherwise), depends on the nature of their work and the immediacy of the threat.
Laboratory personnel who must work with unknown materials and with high concentrations of known infectious materials must be vaccinated.
These are additional justifications for moving ahead with a vigorous development program for anthrax and smallpox vaccines.
Dr. Russell is professor, Center for Immunization Research, Johns Hopkins School of Public Health; former Commander, United States Army Medical Research and Development Command.
References 1.
Committee on R
Institute of Medicine, National Academy of Sciences.
Chemical and Biological Terrorism.
Research and Development to Improve Civilian Medical Response.
Washington: National Academy Press; 1999.
2.
Zajtchtchuk R, Bellamy RF, editors.
Textbook of military medicine: medical aspects of chemical and biological warfare.
Office of the Surgeon General, Department of the Army.
Washington, D.C.; 1997.
3.
Pomeratnsev AP, Startsin NA, Mockov YV, Marnin LI. Expression of cereolysin AB genes in Bacillus Anthracis vaccine strain ensures protection against experimental hemolytic anthrax infection.
Vaccine 1997;15:1846-50.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 533 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Vaccines, Pharmaceutical Products, and Bioterrorism: Challenges for the U.S. Food and Drug Administration Kathryn C. Zoon U.S. Food and Drug Administration, Rockville, Maryland, USA In regards to bioterrorism, the goal of the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) is to foster the development of vaccines, drugs and diagnostic products, safeguards of the food supply, and other measures needed to respond to bioterrorist threats.
Many products (vaccines, therapeutic drug and biological products, food, devices, and diagnostics) regulated by FDA could be affected by bioterrorism.
Pathogens or pathogen products adapted for biological warfare include smallpox (variola), anthrax (Bacillus anthracis), plague (Yersinia pestis), tularemia (Francisella t ularensis), brucellosis (Brucella abortus, B. melitensis, B. suis, B. canis), Q fever (Coxiella burnettii), botulinum toxin (produced by Clostridium botulinum) and staphylococcal enterotoxin B. New products are needed to diagnose, prevent, and treat these public health threats.
FDA is participating in an interagency group preparing for response in a civilian emergency.
This group includes representatives of the Department of Defense; the Veterans Administration; and components of the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS), such as the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), National Institutes of Health (NIH), and Office of Emergency Preparedness.
In addition, FDA will be proposing standards for the use of animal efficacy data in approving new products to counter chemical and biological agents.
The agency is also participating in setting a broadbased federal research agenda to facilitate the governments preparedness against bioterrorism; is identifying facilities and activities suitable for the production of biological weapons; is involved in product development, review, and testing; and is ensuring that appropriate product surveillance Address for correspondence: Kathryn C. Zoon, Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research, Food and Drug Administration, Mailstop HFM-1, 1401 Rockville Pike, Rockville, MD 20852, USA; fax: 301-827-0440; e-mail: zoon@cber.fda.gov and sponsor compliance are executed in accordance with regulations.
FDAs regulation of medical products is based on science, law, and public health considerations (Figure 1).
Research conducted at FDA (in particular at the Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research) contributing to biological warfare defense and other counterbioterrorism efforts is in the following areas: design of new vaccines (e.g., pox viruses); pathogenesis and mechanism of replication of biological warfare agents; new methods and standards to expedite the review of new vaccines and immunoglobulins (e.g., mucosal protection against a pathogen); and stem cell protection and chemokine/cytokine and angiogenic agent defense mechanisms.
The development framework of Review Research Surveillance Policy Compliance Figure 1.
Regulation of medical products.
most biological and traditional drug products is shown in Figure 2.
The principal evaluation and research and development phases before a drug is submitted to FDA for approval can take 1 to 3 years.
The clinical research and development program (investigational phase), depending on the agent and clinical indication, can take 2 to 10 years.
The marketing application review period generally is 2 months to 3 years (average 1 year).
Once a product is approved, long-term postmarketing surveillance, inspections, and product testing are performed to ensure the quality, safety, and efficacy of the product, as Emerging Infectious Diseases 534 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue obtaining clinical efficacy data.
For many of these infectious agents or toxins, human efficacy trials cannot be performed, as such studies would involve exposing healthy human volunteers to a lethal or permanently disabling agent without proven therapy and field trials.
In most cases, such trials are not feasible because pockets of natural exposure do not exist.
To address this dilemma, FDA will be proposing that the use of animal efficacy data be allowed when appropriate (1).
This proposed rule would identify the types of data required.
Safety, pharmacokinetic, and immunogenicity data will still be necessary in humans.
Product safety will likely be evaluated in healthy human volunteers at doses and routes of administration anticipated in field use.
Some scientific considerations for animal studies include the toxic agents pathophysiologic mechanism of toxicity and how the test drug or biologic product prevents it and the validity of the animal study endpoint in humans.
In addition, data showing that drug effectiveness in animals predicts efficacy in humans would be needed.
Finally, product recipients should be given follow-up after treatment to affirm product safety and efficacy.
For licensure or other approval, a biological warfare defense product must have an acceptable quality, safety, efficacy, and potency profile.
Likewise, the product must have acceptable stability characteristics and be produced in compliance with current good manufacturing practices.
A case study of anthrax vaccine can serve as an example of our capability to respond to a bioterrorist threat.
Only one licensed anthrax vaccine (Bioport Corp.) is available.
This vaccine consists of a membrane-sterilized culture filtrate of B. anthracis V770-NP1-R, an avirulent, nonencapsulated strain.
The culture filtrate is adsorbed to aluminum hydroxide and formulated with benzethonium chloride (preservative) and formaldehyde (stabilizer).
The administration schedule consists of 0.5 ml injected subcutaneously at 0, 2, and 4 weeks, 6, 12, and 18 months, and then annually thereafter.
The vaccine was licensed in 1970.
The efficacy data in support of the license consisted of a single-blind, well-controlled field study (2).
The vaccine efficacy was 92.5% (lower 95% confidence limit of 65%).
Of the 26 cases of anthrax in this study, 21 were cutaneous and 5 (4 fatal) were inhalation (2 in the placebo group, 0 in the vaccinated group, 3 in the unvaccinated group).
Research and development Principal Evaluation Clinical research and development Phases 1, 2, 3 1 to 3 years 2 to 10 years Product License Application, Established License Application, New Drug Application, New Drug Application Review 2 months to 3 years Post-marketing survellance Figure 2.
Development of biological and tradition drug products.
well as appropriate product labeling.
Accelerating product development is important in many situations, including bioterrorism.
Mechanisms for advancing medicines through the approval process have been developed for severe and lifethreatening illnesses.
For drugs and biologic products, these mechanisms include expedited review and fast-track development, as well as accelerated approval and priority review of marketing applications.
For a priority product, complete review of marketing applications is 6 months.
Many of the biological warfare defense products pose difficult problems with regard to Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 535 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue In December 1985, the Federal Register (3) published the FDAs advisory panel review of the efficacy of anthrax adsorbed.
The panel recommended that this product be placed in category I (safe, effective, and not misbranded) and that the appropriate license be continued because there was substantial evidence for this product.
Studies of new anthrax vaccine products are in progress.
They include protective antigen based vaccines, e.g., purified protein from B. anthracis culture or live-attenuated spore vaccine.
Production and product testing will differ for each of these candidate vaccines.
The immunogenicity of the product in humans and animal models should be assessed.
The cellmediated immunity elicited by the vaccine may also need to be evaluated.
One of the immune correlates of protection of anthrax vaccines is likely to be the antibody response to protective antigen.
However, the quantitative relation of antiprotective antigen antibody to protection has not been established in humans but is being investigated by the Department of Defense.
Animal challenge and protection models, especially rabbit and nonhuman primate models, may be particularly useful.
Passive transfer of protection, also an indication of the importance of antibodies for protection, has been observed in animal models.
Therefore, human challenge protection studies and new field efficacy trials are not feasible in studying the efficacy of new anthrax vaccines.
Animal challenge and protection studies against spores will be important for new vaccines based on protective antigen.
Comparisons of immune responses in human cohorts receiving new or licensed vaccines should be performed.
Data should be obtained on various target populations, including adults and children, to evaluate the safety of new anthrax vaccines.
Systemic and local adverse events are particularly important to monitor.
For live-attenuated and vector vaccine approaches, the potential for transmission to others will be an important consideration in clinical development and use.
After these vaccines are licensed and administered, the safety and adverse reactions of these vaccines should be assessed.
In conclusion, FDA will be providing a critical link in access of new medicines for biowarfare defense (Table).
The expected outcomes of these activities include safe and effective products to treat or prevent toxicity of biological and chemical agents; methods to rapidly detect, identify, and decontaminate hazardous organisms; a greater ability to ensure the safety of the food supply; and a greater ability to provide appropriate medical care and a public health response.
Table.
Proposed activities of the U.S. Food and Drug Administration to counter bioterrorism 1.
Enhancing the expeditious development and licensure of new vaccines and biological therapeutics through research and review activitiesanthrax vaccine and antisera to botulinum toxin, for example.
2.
Enhancing the timeliness of application reviews of new drugs and biological products and new uses of existing products.
3.
Participating in the planning and coordination of public health and medical response to a terrorist attack involving a biological or chemical agent(s).
4.
Participating in the development of rapid detection and decontamination for agents of bioterrorism such as Clostridium botulinum toxins, Yersinisa pestis, Bacillus anthracis.
5.
Ensuring the safety of regulated foods, drugs, medical devices, and biological products; arrange for seizure and disposal of affected products.
6.
Developing techniques for detection of genetic modifications of microorganisms to make them more toxic or antibiotic- or vaccine-resistant.
7.
Rapidly determining a microbes sensitivity to drug therapy.
8.
Determining the mechanism of replication and pathogenicity or virulence of identified organisms including elements that can be transferred to other organisms to circumvent detection, prevention, or treatment.
9.
Enhancing adverse product reporting surveillance capabilities.
Dr. Zoon is director of the Center for Biologics Evaluation and Research (CBER) at the Food and Drug Administration.
As former director of the Division of Cytokine Biology in CBER, Dr. Zoon was actively involved with regulatory issues related to cytokines, growth factors, studies on interferon purification and characterization, and interferon receptors.
References 1.
Federal Register Vol 63 #80, Monday, April 27, 1998, p. 21957.
2.
Brachman PS, Gold H, Plotkin SA, Fekety FR, Werrin M, Ingraham NR. Field evaluation of a human anthrax vaccine.
Am J Public Health 1962;52:632-45.
3.
Federal Register.
Vol 50 #240, Friday, Dec. 13, 1985, p. 51002-17.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 536 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Smallpox: Clinical and Epidemiologic Features D. A. Henderson Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies, Baltimore, Maryland, USA Clinical and Epidemiologic Characteristics of Smallpox Smallpox is a viral disease unique to humans.
To sustain itself, the virus must pass from person to person in a continuing chain of infection and is spread by inhalation of air droplets or aerosols.
Twelve to 14 days after infection, the patient typically becomes febrile and has severe aching pains and prostration.
Some 2 to 3 days later, a papular rash develops over the face and spreads to the extremities (Figure 1).
The rash soon becomes vesicular and later, pustular (Figure 2).
The patient remains febrile throughout the evolution of the rash and customarily experiences considerable pain as the pustules grow and expand.
Gradually, scabs form, which eventually separate, leaving pitted scars.
Death usually occurs during the second week.
The disease most commonly confused with smallpox is chickenpox, and during the first 2 to 3 days of rash, it may be all but impossible to distinguish between the two.
However, all smallpox lesions develop at the same pace and, on any part of the body, appear identical.
Chickenpox lesions are much more superficial and develop in crops.
With chickenpox, scabs, vesicles, and pustules may be seen simultaneously on adjacent areas of skin.
Moreover, the rash in chickenpox is more dense over the trunk (the reverse of smallpox), and chickenpox lesions are almost never found on the palms or soles.
In 5% to 10% of smallpox patients, more rapidly progressive, malignant disease develops, which is almost always fatal within 5 to 7 days.
In such patients, the lesions are so densely confluent that the skin looks like crepe rubber; Figure 1.
Most cases of smallpox are clinically typical and readily able to be diagnosed.
Lesions on each area of the body are at the same stage of development, are deeply embedded in the skin, and are more densely concentrated on the face and extremities.
Address for correspondence: D. A. Henderson, Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies, 111 Market Place, Ste. 850, Baltimore, MD 21202, USA; fax: 410-223-1665; e-mail: dahzero@aol.com.
Figure 2.
The lesions of chickenpox develop as a series of crops over several days and are very superficial.
Papules, vesicles, pustules, and scabs can be seen adjacent to each other.
The trunk is usually more affected than the face or extremities.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 537 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue some patients exhibit bleeding into the skin and intestinal tract.
Such cases are difficult to diagnose, but they are exceedingly infectious.
Smallpox spreads most readily during the cool, dry winter months but can be transmitted in any climate and in any part of the world.
The only weapons against the disease are vaccination and patient isolation.
Vaccination before exposure or within 2 to 3 days after exposure affords almost complete protection against disease.
Vaccination as late as 4 to 5 days after exposure may protect against death.
Because smallpox can only be transmitted from the time of the earliest appearance of rash, early detection of cases and prompt vaccination of all contacts is critical.
Another outbreak occurred in Yugoslavia in February 1972 (1).
Despite routine vaccination in Yugoslavia, the first case in the 1972 outbreak resulted in 11 others; those 11, on average, each infected 13 more.
Other outbreaks in Europe from 1958 on showed that such explosive spread was not unusual during the seasonal period of high transmission, i.e., December through April.
One can only speculate on the probable rapidity of spread of the smallpox virus in a population where no one younger than 25 years of age has ever been vaccinated and older persons have little remaining residual immunity.
Where might the virus come from? At one time, it was believed that the smallpox virus was restricted to only two high-security laboratories, one at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in Atlanta, Georgia, and one at the Russian State Centre for Research on Virology and Biotechnology, Koltsovo, Novosibirsk Region.
By resolution of the 1996 World Health Assembly (WHA), those stocks were slated to be destroyed at the end of June 1999.
The desirability of such an action was reaffirmed by a World Health Organization Expert Committee in January 1999.
On May 22, 1999, WHA, however, passed a resolution postponing destruction until 2002, by which time any promise of the variola virus stocks for public health research could be determined.
Destruction of the virus would be at least one step to limit the risk for the reemergence of smallpox.
However, despite widespread acceptance of the 1972 Bioweapons Convention Treaty, which called for all countries to destroy their stocks of bioweapons and to cease all research on offensive weapons, other laboratories in Russia and perhaps in other countries maintain the virus.
Iraq and the Soviet Union were signatories to the convention, as was the United States.
However, as reported by the former deputy director of the Russian Bioweapons Program, officials of the former Soviet Union took notice of the worlds decision in 1980 to cease smallpox vaccination, and in the atmosphere of the cold war, they embarked on an ambitious plan to produce smallpox virus in large quantities and use it as a weapon.
At least two other laboratories in the former Soviet Union are now reported to maintain smallpox virus, and one may have the capacity to produce the virus in tons at least monthly.
Moreover, Russian biologists, like physicists and chemists, Smallpox Vaccination Smallpox vaccination is associated with some risk for adverse reactions; the two most serious are postvaccinal encephalitis and progressive vaccinia.
Postvaccinal encephalitis occurs at a rate of 3 per million primary vaccinees; 40% of the cases are fatal, and some patients are left with permanent neurologic damage.
Progressive vaccinia occurs among those who are immunosuppressed because of a congenital defect, malignancy, radiation therapy, or AIDS.
The vaccinia virus simply continues to grow, and unless these patients are treated with vaccinia immune globulin, they may not recover.
Pustular material from the vaccination site may also be transferred to other parts of the body, sometimes with serious results.
Routine vaccination is only recommended for laboratory staff who may be exposed to one of the orthopoxviruses.
There are two reasons for this.
First is the risk for complications.
Second, U.S. national vaccine stocks are sufficient to immunize only 6 to 7 million persons.
This amount is only marginally sufficient for emergency needs.
Plans are now being made to expand this reserve.
However, at least 36 months are required before large quantities can be produced.
The potential of smallpox as a biological weapon is most dramatically illustrated by two European smallpox outbreaks in the 1970s.
The first occurred in Meschede, Germany, in 1970 (1).
This outbreak illustrates that smallpox virus in an aerosol suspension can spread widely and infect at very low doses.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 538 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue may have left Russia to sell their services to rogue governments.
Smallpox is rated among the most dangerous of all potential biological weapons, with farreaching ramifications.
Dr. Henderson is a distinguished service professor at the Johns Hopkins University, holding an appointment in the Department of Epidemiology.
Dr. Henderson directed the World Health Organizations global small- pox eradication campaign (1966-1977) and helped initiate WHOs global program of immunization in 1974.
He also served as deputy assistant secretary and senior science advisor in the Department of Health and Human Services.
Reference 1.
Henderson DA. Bioterrorism as a public health threat.
Emerg Infect Dis 1998;4:488-92.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 539 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Smallpox: An Attack Scenario Tara OToole Johns Hopkins School of Public Health, Baltimore, Maryland, USA Smallpox virus, which is among the most dangerous organisms that might be used by bioterrorists, is not widely available.
The international black market trade in weapons of mass destruction is probably the only means of acquiring the virus.
Thus, only a terrorist supported by the resources of a rogue state would be able to procure and deploy smallpox.
An attack using the virus would involve relatively sophisticated strategies and would deliberately seek to sow public panic, disrupt and discredit official institutions, and shake public confidence in government.
The following scenario is intended to provoke thought and dialogue that might illuminate the uncertainties and challenges of bioterrorism and stimulate review of institutional capacities for rapid communication and coordinated action in the wake of an attack.
equipment.
FBI decides its information is too vague and too sensitive to pass on to the Department of Health and Human Services, local law enforcement authorities, or the state health department.
April 8 FBI informants report rumors that something happened while the vice-president was in Northeast.
April 12 A 20-year-old university student goes to the university hospital emergency room with fever and severe muscle aches.
She is pale, has a temperature of 103�F, and is slightly leukopenic, but the physical exam and laboratory results are otherwise normal.
She is presumed to have a viral infection and is sent home with instructions to drink fluids and take aspirin or ibuprofen for muscle aches.
Later that day, a 40-year-old electrician arrives at the emergency room with severe lower backache, headache, shaking chills, and vomiting.
He appears pale and has a temperature of 102�F and a pale erythematous rash on the face.
The patient is a native of Puerto Rico, where he visited 10 days earlier.
A diagnosis of dengue fever is considered, and the patient is discharged with ibuprofen and instructions to drink fluids.
April 13 Over the course of the day, four young adults in their twenties come to the university hospital emergency room with influenzalike symptoms and are sent home.
April 14 The female student returns to the emergency room after collapsing in class.
She now has a red, vesicular rash on the face and arms and appears acutely ill.
Her temperature is 102�F; her blood pressure is normal.
She is admitted to an isolation room with presumptive diagnosis of Capacity To Detect a Bioterrorist Attack and To Diagnose an Unusual Disease April 1 The vice-president visits Northeast, a city of 2.5 million.
His itinerary includes an awards ceremony, an appearance at a local magnet school, and a major speech at the local university.
A crowd of 1,000 people, including students, is gathered in the university auditorium.
Hundreds more wait outside, where the vice-president stops to shake hands and respond to queries from the media.
The Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) has information suggesting a possible threat against the vice-president from a terrorist group with suspected links to a rogue state.
The group is known to have made inquiries about acquiring biological pathogens, including smallpox, and is suspected of having procured aerosolization Address for correspondence: Tara OToole, Johns Hopkins Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies, Candler Building, Suite 850, 111 Market Place, Baltimore, MD 21202, USA; fax: 410-223-1665; e-mail: biodefen@jhsph.edu.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 540 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue adult chickenpox.
She has had no contact with others known to have chickenpox.
April 15 The electrician first seen on April 12 returns to the emergency room by ambulance.
He too has a vesicular rash and appears very ill.
He is also admitted to an isolation room with presumptive diagnosis of chickenpox.
That evening at 6 p.m. the infectious disease consultant and the hospital epidemiologist meet on the elevator.
The infectious disease specialist has just finished examining the student and the electrician, both of whom have vesicular rash on the face, arms, hands, and feet.
The skin lesions are evolving in phase.
The possibility of smallpox is raised.
The infectious disease specialist takes a swab specimen from the electricians skin lesions, sends it to the laboratory, and requests that it be examined by electron microscopy by an experienced technician.
The doctor assures the technician that he will be vaccinated if the specimen shows smallpox.
At 7:00 p.m., electron microscopy shows an orthopoxvirus consistent with variolathe smallpox virus.
At 7:15 p.m. the hospital epidemiologist declares a contagious disease emergency.
The two patients are moved to negative-pressure rooms with HEPA filters.
Visitors and hospital staff not already caring for and in contact with patients are forbidden to enter the floor.
Infection-control nurses begin interviewing staff to determine who has been in face-to-face contact with the patients during initial emergency room visits and admission.
The hospital epidemiologist calls the chair of the department of medicine and the hospital vice-president for medical affairs.
Within 45 minutes the chair of the department of medicine and the president of the hospital are meeting with the infectious disease physician, the hospital epidemiologist, the hospital vice-president for public relations, and the hospitals general counsel.
The city and state health commissioners join the meeting by phone.
The need to vaccinate and isolate all contacts of the patients is recognized and discussed.
It is decided to secure the hospital.
No one is allowed to leave until all persons are identified so that they can be vaccinated as soon as vaccine can be obtained from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).
The possibility of identifying and vaccinating other patient contacts (e.g., family members not now in the hospital) is discussed, but no decisions are made because the hospitals legal authority for doing this is unclear.
Half an hour later, the state health commissioner calls FBI.
He also contacts CDC to request that smallpox vaccine be released for hospital staff and patient contacts.
Because vaccine supplies are limited, CDC requests that the diagnosis of smallpox first be confirmed at CDC.
CDC calls FBI and arranges to fly a threeperson Epidemic Intelligence Service team to Northeast for assistance.
By 9:30 p.m., an FBI special agent arrives at the hospital, secures biological samples taken from the patients, and drives them to Andrews Air Force Base, where a military aircraft flies the samples to CDCs Biosafety Level 4 laboratory in Atlanta, Georgia.
FBI requests that city police be called to help maintain order and ensure that no patients, staff, or visitors leave the hospital until all occupants have been identified and their addresses have been recorded.
More FBI agents and city police arrive on the hospital grounds.
Hospital visitors are confused and angered by police refusal to allow anyone to leave the hospital.
No explanation is given for the containment to staff, visitors, or the police.
Ambulances are rerouted to other hospitals.
The rumor that smallpox has broken out rapidly spreads through the building, as do rumors that a terrorist wanted by FBI is in the building.
A fight erupts between people trying to leave the facility and the police.
Three people are injured and sent to the emergency room.
More police and FBI agents arrive and surround the building.
The local television networks report the scene outside the hospital on the late night news.
The hospital public relations representative explains that the lock-in is temporary and intended only to gather names and addresses so that people can be contacted and treated if a suspected, but unnamed, contagious disease is confirmed.
CNN arrives and demands access to the hospital and affected patients.
Rumors about what the contagious disease might be include Hong Kong flu, meningitis, Ebola virus, smallpox, and measles.
The mayor and state attorney generals office are contacted by the health commissioner.
There is a phone discussion with the hospitals general counsel and epidemiologist about the right to impose quarantine.
Visitors, nonessential personnel, and new patients are blocked from Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 541 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue entering the hospital, but visitors already in the building are allowed to leave after their names and addresses are recorded.
FBI, however, is reluctant to allow anyone to leave the building.
This provokes a lengthy exchange among the FBI agent-in-charge, the city police chief, and hospital administrators and attorneys.
The dispute is resolved after a series of phone calls between FBI headquarters and the state attorney generals office.
sioner presses for enough vaccine for the entire city of Northeast.
FBI and CDC are reluctant to begin mass vaccination until the dimensions of the outbreak are better understood.
It is decided to vaccinate all hospital staff and any visitors to the floor where the patients were located.
All direct contacts of the patients will also be vaccinated.
By the end of the long phone conference, the decision is made to vaccinate all health-care personnel, first responders, police, and firefighters in any city with confirmed cases of smallpox.
CDC Epidemic Intelligence Service officers arrive in Northeast to assist the state epidemiologist, who is establishing a statewide surveillance and case investigation system.
Efforts begin to develop a registry of all face-toface contacts of smallpox patients and to monitor, daily, all contacts for fever.
Anyone who has fever 
The state health department activates a prearranged phone tree to query all hospitals and walk-in clinics in the state about similar cases and counsels immediate isolation of all suspected patients.
An additional eight admissions for fever and vesicular rash are discovered.
All patients are extremely ill; two are delirious.
The university hospital emergency room records are searched, and staff attempt to contact all patients who had fever during the previous week.
Three more probable smallpox cases are discovered.
Telephone follow-up reveals that one has been admitted to another hospital out of state.
CDC and state health officials discuss possible strategies for managing the epidemic if there is insufficient vaccine for all patient contacts, as seems likely.
Home isolation of nonvaccinated patient contacts is considered, but the legal authorities, practical logistics, and ethical implications of such a strategy remain unclear and unresolved.
After discussion among state health authorities and university hospital staff, it is decided that the university will serve as the citys smallpox hospital and will accept transfers of smallpox patients now hospitalized at other facilities in the state.
Other hospitals will refer patients to the university hospital or to the state armory but will not admit patients with suspected smallpox.
Physicians will be urged to avoid seeking admission for most smallpox Early Response 11:30 p.m.
The specimen arrives at CDC.
At midnight, the diagnosis of smallpox is confirmed.
A phone conference with hospital staff, the city police chief, the state health commissioner, the state attorney general, the governor, CDC, FBI, an assistant secretary of the Health and Human Service (HHS), and staff from the National Security Council and the White House (32 people in all) focuses on whether and how to release the information to the media.
The mayor and the governor will go on television in the morning with the health commissioner.
The FBI director will also make a statement.
The president will address the country at noon.
CDC makes arrangements to release smallpox vaccine early the next morning for use by patient contacts and the health-care teams caring for hospitalized victims.
April 16 Morning conference calls between CDC, FBI, HHS, the National Security Council, and state health authorities are set up.
Federal officials now assume that a bioterrorist attack has occurred in Northeast.
There is concern that other attacks might also have taken place but not yet come to light or that further attacks might be imminent.
A representative from the counterterrorism office of the National Security Council asks if it is necessary or desirable to attempt a complete quarantine of Northeast, including closure of the city airport and a ban on rail traffic leaving from or stopping in the city.
The group agrees that such a step is neither feasible nor warranted.
A heated debate follows about the advisability of vaccinating all hospital staff and visitors at all facilities where a single case of smallpox is clinically suspected.
The state health commis- Emerging Infectious Diseases 542 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue patients and to care for patients in their homes.
Arrangements are made by the state health commissioner to activate a state disaster plan, which establishes the armory as an emergency hospital for the quarantine of smallpox patients, in case the number of smallpox patients exceeds hospital isolation capabilities.
vaccination of all employees whose jobs involve direct patient contact.
April 18 An additional 20,000 residents of Northeast are vaccinated.
April 19 CDC and the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases (USAMRIID) determine that the infecting strain of smallpox was not bioengineered.
The genomic sequence is entirely typical of known smallpox strains.
The student with the first diagnosed case dies.
Ten more smallpox cases have been identified, bringing the number of confirmed cases to 50.
The patients are located in four states, all in the mid-Atlantic area.
Suspected cases are identified in five other states.
April 20 Governors of affected and unaffected states press, both behind the scenes and publicly, for emergency vaccine stocks to be distributed to states so that immediate action can be taken should an outbreak occur.
At the close of day 4 of the vaccination campaign, 80,000 have been vaccinated.
April 22-27 No new cases of smallpox with onset after April 19 have been confirmed, although many suspected cases with fever and rash due to other causes are being seen.
In the states reporting confirmed smallpox cases, thousands of people are seeking medical care because of worrisome symptoms.
CDC and state health authorities decide to issue a recommendation that patients with fever who cannot be definitively diagnosed be strictly quarantined and observed until the fever subsides.
CDC and state health departments are flooded with calls from health-care providers seeking guidance on isolation procedures.
Some hospitals and health maintenance organizations (HMOs) complain to HHS that they cannot afford to isolate the many patients with fever and rash at their facilities and demand that the government pay quarantine costs.
State health departments are similarly worried about the costs of quarantine.
Local media report an outbreak of sick children with rash in an area elementary school.
Quarantine and Vaccination During the morning interagency phone conference, Department of Justice representatives raise questions about potential legal liabilities associated with adverse vaccine effects.
The questions remain unresolved, but vaccination will proceed.
On the evening of April 16, the president goes on television to inform the nation of the bioterrorist attack by unknown terrorists, vows that the assailants will be identified and brought to justice, and urges calm and cooperation with health authorities.
The initial epidemiologic evidence and FBI information suggest that the smallpox release likely occurred during the vice-presidents January speech at the university in Northeast.
Efforts are begun to identify and vaccinate everyone who attended the speech.
Additional health department personnel are detailed to help in the epidemiologic investigation.
Media reports say that the government does not know how many people are sick or how widespread the outbreak might be.
By evening, 35 more cases are identified in eight emergency rooms and clinics around the city; 10 cases are reported in an adjoining state.
CDC alerts all state health departments to be on alert for possible smallpox; CDC also urges prompt and strict isolation measures and instructs states to send specimens from suspected patients to its headquarters in Atlanta for definitive laboratory diagnosis.
April 17 In Northeast, 10,000 residents are vaccinated by the city and state health departments with assistance from volunteer physicians and nurses.
Vaccination of the entire university student body, faculty, and staff is discussed and rejected by federal officials for fear that vaccine supplies will be needed for contacts of confirmed cases.
State health officials continue to press for a statewide vaccination effort.
Unions representing nurses and other health-care workers call for Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 543 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue It is unclear whether the illness is chickenpox or smallpox.
Television stations show film of parents arriving at school in midday to remove children from classrooms.
A college basketball star is rushed to hospital by ambulance with an unknown illness.
Local television reports that the athlete has high fever but no rash.
Both stories are covered on the national evening news.
April 28 Smallpox is diagnosed in two young children in Megalopolis, a large city in another state.
FBI and the National Security Council worry that these cases might signal another attack since the children have had no discernible contact with a smallpox patient or contacts.
The possibility that there has been a new attack is weighed against the possibility that the children were infected by a contact of one of the first wave of patients who was missed in the epidemiologic investigation.
Members of the state congressional delegation demand that the federal government implement a massive citywide vaccination program.
CDC notes that a Megalopolis-wide vaccination program would deplete the entire civilian vaccine supply.
The media report that the president, vicepresident, cabinet representatives, and prominent members of Congress have been vaccinated, and the military has already begun to vaccinate the troops in affected states and Washington, D.C.
Another 200 probable cases are reported during the day.
CDC receives thousands of requests for vaccine from individual physicians and announces that vaccine will be distributed only through state health departments.
Governors of a dozen states are calling the White House, demanding vaccine.
One state attorney general announces a suit against the federal government to force release of vaccine for a large-scale vaccination campaign.
The federal government announces that 90% of available vaccine stocks will be distributed to affected states, but cautions that the available quantity of vaccine can cover only 15% of those states populations.
Governors are to determine their own state-specific priorities and mechanisms of vaccine distribution.
Federal officials also announce an accelerated crash vaccineproduction program that will reduce vaccinemanufacturing time to 24 months.
April 30 A well-known college athlete dies of hemorrhagic smallpox.
The rumor is reported that he was the victim of a new biological attack using a different organism since he did not develop the rash associated with classic smallpox.
Television commentators misinterpret technical statements from a health-care expert; the commentators report that the athlete died of hemorrhagic fever, and they read clinical descriptions of Ebola virus infection on the air.
The White House and CDC receive dozens of calls from furious governors, mayors, and health commissioners, demanding to know why they were not informed of additional bioterrorist attacks using Ebola.
Nurses, doctors, and hospital-support personnel in health centers walk off the job.
Thousands of people who attended college basketball games where the deceased athlete played call the health department and ask for treatment.
HHS issues a press release explaining that the athlete did not have Ebola virus.
FBI affirms that there is no reason to believe that an attack using any hemorrhagic fever virus has occurred, but FBI refuses to rule out the possibility that there has been more than a single bioterrorist attack using smallpox.
April 31 The widely publicized death of the college basketball star, plus dramatic footage of young The Epidemic Expands April 29 Over the course of the day, CDC receives reports of an additional 100 new cases of potential smallpox.
Sixty of these are in the original state.
The others are scattered over eight states.
It is not immediately clear if these are truly smallpox or mistaken diagnoses.
By evening, laboratory confirmation of smallpox is obtained at CDC.
Two cases in Montreal and one in London are also reported.
CDC and health agencies now recognize that they are seeing a second generation of smallpox cases.
It is presumed that the latest victims were infected by contact with those who attended the vicepresidents speech, but a second bioterrorism attack cannot be immediately ruled out.
CDC enlists additional epidemiologists from around the country to join teams tracking patients and their contacts.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 544 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue children covered with pox, drive thousands of people to emergency rooms and doctors offices with requests for vaccination and evaluation of fever and other symptoms.
This escalation in requests for evaluation and care hampers the ability of state health authorities and CDC to confirm the number of actual new cases.
May 1 The number of smallpox cases continues to grow.
There are now 
In Northeast, the capacity of local hospitals to accommodate patients needing isolation has long been exceeded.
Smallpox cases and suspected contacts are being isolated in the local armory and convention center, where volunteer physicians and nurses are providing care.
May 5 Epidemiologists are working around the clock to interview patients, trace the chain of infection, place contacts under surveillance, and isolate smallpox victims.
The evidence continues to indicate that the vice-presidents visit to Northeast was the occasion for the release, but some authorities remain concerned about multiple releases.
May 15-29 The third generation of the epidemic begins.
Cases are reported in Northeast, parts of the country far beyond Northeast, and worldwide.
The death rate remains 30%.
Vaccine supplies are exhausted.
Public concern is mounting rapidly.
The president has declared states with the largest numbers of victims and people in quarantine to be disaster areas.
Congress votes to release federal funds to pay for costs of quarantine.
Over the next 2 weeks, 7,000 cases will have been reported.
May 30 The fourth generation of cases begins.
By mid-June, 15,000 cases of smallpox will be reported in the United States.
Twenty states report cases, as do four foreign countries.
More than 2,000 will have died.
The deceased include two members of the vice-presidents staff and a secret service agent.
The city of Northeast, which is hardest hit by the epidemic, has experienced several outbreaks of civil unrest.
The National Guard has been called in to help police keep order and to guard the facilities where smallpox cases and contacts are isolated.
The mayor of Northeast is hospitalized with a heart attack.
Conclusions The rate of development of new smallpox cases reported worldwide now appears to be stabilizing and perhaps subsiding.
Vaccination of contacts has undoubtedly been of benefit.
Perhaps more important is the seasonal decrease in the spread of virus as warmer weather returns.
Many business conventions scheduled to convene in Northeast during the early summer are canceled.
Tourist trade, a major source of state income, is at a standstill.
Many small businesses in the city have failed because suppliers and customers are reluctant to visit the area.
Attendance at theaters and sports events is down markedly.
In several states, public schools are dismissed 1 month early, in part because parents, fearful of contagion, are keeping their children home, and partly because teachers are refusing to come to work.
Across the country, people refuse to serve on juries or attend public meetings for fear of contracting smallpox.
In hospitals and HMOs where staff have not been vaccinated, health-care personnel have staged protests, and some have walked off the job.
The exponential increase in cases around the globe has caused some governments to institute strict, harshly enforced isolation and quarantine procedures.
Human rights organizations report numerous cases of smallpox patients being abandoned to die or of recovering patients being denied housing and food.
Domestic and international travel is greatly reduced.
Travelers avoid countries known to have smallpox.
Some countries refuse to admit U.S. citizens without proof of recent smallpox vaccination.
Others have imposed 14-day quarantines on all persons entering the country from abroad.
A lucrative black market in falsified vaccination certificates has sprung up.
Congress has begun oversight investigations into the epidemic.
A congressman accuses the U.S. Food and Drug Administration of deliberately obstructing the development of smallpox vaccine and vows to hold hearings into the matter.
Congressional investigations of what FBI knew, when they knew it, and whom they talked with, are ongoing.
Multiple lawsuits have Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 545 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue been filed on behalf of and against HMOs, hospitals, and state and federal governments.
Several large HMOs refuse to pay states for costs associated with caring for patients in isolation wards and quarantine facilities.
The states with largest numbers of cases have spent millions of dollars on the epidemic, including establishing quarantine operations, paying for added public health personnel, and overtime pay for police.
In the United States, periodic rumors of miracle treatments, many fueled by the media, provoke ardent demands on a beleaguered health-care system.
Since vaccine supplies were depleted, many people seeking protection have turned to ancient techniques.
Some physicians are practicing arm-to-arm transfer of vaccinia, with a few attempting immunization with inoculation of smallpox virus from pustules.
Smallpox continues to spread in many parts of the world, echoing its formerly endemic character.
Without vaccine, the only control method is isolation, which hinders, but cannot halt, the spread of the disease.
By years end, endemic smallpox is reestablished in 14 countries.
The World Health Assembly schedules a debate on reenacting a global smallpox eradication campaign.
Dr. OToole is a senior fellow at the Johns Hopkins University Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies.
The Center, sponsored by the Hopkins Schools of Public Health and Medicine, is dedicated to informing policy decisions and promoting practices that would help prevent the use of biological weapons.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 546 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Aftermath of a Hypothetical Smallpox Disaster Jason Bardi Johns Hopkins University, Baltimore, Maryland, USA The second day of the symposium featured a discussion of a scenario in which a medium-sized American city is attacked with smallpox.
Four panels represented various time milestones after the attack, from a few weeks to several months.
Panelists discussed what they and their colleagues might be doing at each of these milestones.
The goal of the responses was to communicate the complexity of the issues and to explore the diverse problems that might arise beyond the care and treatment of patients.
The scenario itself was a step-by-step account of a smallpox epidemic in the fictional city of Northeast.
Tara OToole, the scenarios lead author, read the narrative account before each panel.
The panelists responded to the events as if the epidemic were real and they were actually trying to identify, contain, communicate, and otherwise deal with it.
Panel members included experts on hospital, city, state, federal, and media responses.
Representing the hospitals were John Bartlett and Trish Perl, Johns Hopkins Hospital; Julie Gerberding, Hospital Infections Program, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention; and Gregory Moran, Emergency Medicine, University of California at Los Angeles.
Jerome Hauer represented New York Citys response.
Representing the state were Michael Ascher, California Department of Health Services Laboratory; Arne Carlson, former governor of Minnesota; Terry OBrien, a Minnesota State Assistant Attorney General; and Michael Osterholm, Minnesota Department of Public Health.
The federal representatives on the panels were Robert Blitzer, former counterterrorism chief with the Federal Bureau of Investigation; Robert DeMartino, Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services AdministraAddress for correspondence: Jason Bardi, Johns Hopkins University, Center for Civilian Biodefense Studies, 111 Market Place, Ste. 850, Baltimore, MD 21202, USA; fax 410223-1665; jsb14@jhunix.hcf.jhu.edu. tion; Robert Knouss, Office of Emergency Preparedness, Department of Health and Human Services; and Scott Lillibridge, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
Joanne Rodgers, Johns Hopkins Medical Institutions Public Affairs, spoke to the response of the media.
George Strait, the medical news director for ABC News, acted as moderator for each of the panels scheduled on day two.
D.A. Henderson also helped to moderate.
Identifying the Agent At the start of the epidemic, 2 weeks after the bioterrorist attack, confusion reigns.
There is uncertainty as to what the infection is and reluctance to diagnose smallpox even when it is suspected.
It is unclear who is in charge of investigating and containing the epidemic.
Outside, reporters are knocking on the hospital doors.
The question of what took so long to identify the agent opens the panel.
Smallpox, a nonspecific flulike illness, is hard to diagnose, replies an emergency medicine physician.
The disease is not suspected because it was eradicated in the late 1970s.
Any laboratory work on the first cases would initially be testing for a battery of other causes, such as other viral infections (e.g., monkeypox) or reactions to recent vaccinations.
A window of 2 weeks before positive identification of smallpox may even be optimistic.
The diagnosis would probably take much longer because of physicians lack of familiarity with the disease.
When all the tests for other infections turn up negative and smallpox is strongly suspected, suggests a state laboratory chief, a conclusive result from the laboratories at the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) or the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases (USAMRIID) would still be needed.
These are the only two places in the United States equipped to identify smallpox virus in tissue samples.
This part of the diagnosis is fairly straightforward but it would take at Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 547 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue least 1 day before the definitive results could be obtained.
management teams, as well as the city health commissioner, the city health department, and the mayor, are involved.
The problems of the city become state problems immediately, counters the former governor, because the news media treat any potential infectious disease outbreak as a regional problem.
This forces the governors hand.
The governor has to move in because there is a need for one person to be in charge.
The most difficult situation is how to deal with the hospital patients.
One danger in the early days is losing control of the crisis through panic.
Once rumors about smallpox start to spread, many workers within the hospital walk off the job.
Understaffing also leads to increased stress and confusion for patients and providers alike.
Even before federal and state command structures are in place, suggests a hospital infections control expert, hospital epidemiologists would already be addressing infection control issues.
She notes that hospital infection control specialists would be on the phone to colleagues in other city hospitals alerting one another.
Hospital epidemiologists, adds a state health official, would have a contact list of state, local, and federal public-health authorities who also would be notified.
Another problem in coordination becomes clear to panelists: the difficulty in sharing classified risk information among agencies and various levels of government.
Any early warning, which could have contributed to a more effective response, was missing in the scenario.
Even though the FBI had some early intelligence of the attack, the alerting of health care workers was nonexistent.
The problem lies in the fact, assesses a state health department official, that health departments have never been seen as intelligence communities, nor has there ever been a precedent for passing such information to them.
On the federal level, CDC addresses the public health issues of the epidemic, and FBI addresses the law enforcement issues.
These aims are not necessarily exclusive of one another, and the possibility of linking efforts is raised.
Everyone interviewed as a part of the epidemiologic investigation may have to be interviewed as part of the criminal investigation as well.
Perhaps the most effective way to accomplish this is to conduct both interviews simultaneously.
Responding at the Hospital Level Hospitals would probably isolate the early cases presumptively, even if smallpox was not suspected, since the symptoms would appear infectious.
This is the opinion of a hospital infections expert.
In the city, argues a state health department professional, several hospitals would each see one or two of the first few cases.
The city health department would quickly become aware of the similarity of the cases in the various hospitals, recognize a potential outbreak (probably measles) and mobilize early to contain it.
Once smallpox is identified, the following organizations within city government would be notified: the police department, the local emergency management office, the city health commissioners office, and, ultimately, the mayors office.
This process may be difficult since it requires integrating the health department into emergency management plans, an event with little precedent, notes a city emergency official.
Coordinating Response Efforts Who is in charge, agree panelists, is one of the most important questions yearly in the epidemic, because any large-scale relief effort would require good management.
Complicating the answer, however, are various levels of government, each with its own responsibilities and perspective on response, as reflected in panelists remarks.
Acts of domestic terrorism are under the jurisdiction of the federal government, so several federal agencies become involved, starting with FBI.
FBI is involved from the very beginning since any cases of smallpox would indicate a deliberate terrorist attack.
A criminal investigation begins immediately.
CDC is involved as soon as samples are sent for laboratory diagnosis.
The state government becomes involved at the outset, since major threats to public health are dealt with on the state level.
The state health department starts its own investigation, and to reassure the public, the governor may act as a spokesperson for the management of the epidemic.
The city is involved from the outset, explains the city emergency management official, understanding that bioterrorism is a local issue, which escalates very rapidly to state and federal levels.
The local police and emergency Emerging Infectious Diseases 548 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue Some aspects of the two federal agencies may overlap, perhaps even conflict, in agendas.
Specimens that are sent to CDC for positive identification of the smallpox virus may be needed by FBI as evidence for any eventual prosecution.
In many ways, it may appear as if FBI is running the investigation.
However, dealing with the sick, obtaining vaccine, and mobilizing the epidemiologic investigation at the local, state, and federal levels are outside the scope of FBI.
CDC takes the lead on these public health issues, and together with FBI, coordinates the management of federal resources.
However, who is coordinating activities at the hospitals is still unclear, and the question of authority on that level is unresolved.
Can outsiders come into a hospital and wield power, and if so, who are they? Federal responders may have ambiguous authority within a hospital and may add to the chaos.
An FBI offical notes that his agencys role in the hospitals will simply be to inform the doctors and administrators of what the hospital needs to do to assist in the criminal investigationkeeping evidence and coordinating interviews with patients.
However, this may still leave gaps of authority within the hospital.
In the scenario under consideration, the state identifies one hospital as the smallpox hospital, and this also presents a problem of coordination.
The hospital itself has to work out the details of local quarantine and the distribution of medicine to the patients, and there is a need to protect the health-care workers and other hospital staff.
Vaccine should be immediately available to these workers, and its distribution will have to be coordinated with CDC.
Outside the hospitals, an epidemiologic investigation will be taking place that will need to be coordinated with CDC.
A CDC official points out the need for surveillance in the early days of the epidemic.
To assist in collecting data necessary to identify the release source and people at risk, he recommends that CDC provide additional staff for much of the epidemiologic work, including mid- and senior-level investigators.
Bringing in these outside experts should not represent a problem for local officials, he suggests, since CDC already has strong ties with state epidemiologists. panelists.
Reporters on the hospital scene will quickly become aware of any rumors and will demand answers of any worker or official who is handy.
Official channels will not be the only source of information during the epidemic, argues the public affairs specialist.
First responders, such as the police or fire officials, might show up with full biohazard protection; such an image immediately raises questions.
The media will digest information from day one, whether or not there is an official statement from the city, state, or federal level.
Controlling the message that goes out over the airwaves could be extremely difficult, especially since there may not even be any consensus on what the message should be in the first place.
Several panelists point out the need to ensure that information presented to the media is consistent and credible.
The city emergency manager suggests that the mayor will work with federal and state officials to get consistent and credible information out to the public.
One viable alternative to speculation and misinformation, proposes an FBI official, is to have a centralized joint information center, such as the one his agency set up in Oklahoma City after the bombing, with several experts answering all the questions that arise.
Regardless of how information is disseminated, the message must be carefully considered.
If the flulike symptoms of smallpox are identified on the evening news, a flood of noninfected persons with stuffy noses or headaches could swell emergency rooms across the state.
Other reports, such as upcoming quarantine efforts, may also spread panic and should be handled carefully.
The types of stories the media choose to write present a challenge.
The press will not only cover the crisis but the managers of the crisis.
Plans for responding to questions about crisis management must be in place.
Whether or not the message that goes out to the public includes mention of terrorism should be weighed.
The hospital infections expert pursues a different angle to the issue of information exchange.
The difficulties in interviewing the public have not been solved, she points out.
Who will do the interviews? How they will be coordinated with criminal investigations? Who will receive vaccine? And how will health-care workers be protected? Will the system be overwhelmed by false casespeople who think they have smallpox? Moreover, a basic problem Informing the Public How to control the message going to the public weighs heavily upon the minds of all Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 549 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue in the early days of the epidemic is the need for an infrastructure to handle the large volume of calls flooding the hospitals.
sequestered causes them to leave hospitals understaffed.
Many people are likely to stay at their posts if they feel they have reliable information and support, argues a mental health provider.
Some, however, may leave the front lines to go home to their own families.
Handling Logistics What will be the plan of action? Hundreds of people will have to be mobilized to interview the public, and hundreds more will be needed to administer vaccine.
The distribution of antibiotics and vaccines represents a logistical problem that must be overcome.
As the epidemic grows and spreads to several states, friction between the levels of government grows.
Governors are demanding vaccine supplies, fueling a larger debate of how vaccination should be handled.
Tens of thousands of people are vaccinated, but many more still need vaccine.
Media reports begin to be critical of the governments handling of the crisis.
What still needs to be done? With a growing number of deaths, the rise in the number of patients in quarantine, the loss of critical healthcare workers and city emergency workers, within the city things are beginning to get out of focus, notes a city official.
Asking how leadership will function inside the hospital, the hospital epidemiologist identifies a need for official responses that are well thought out, strong, and based on hard science.
The vaccine campaign poses significant issues.
The limited supply of vaccine must be divided up and distributed according to greatest riskpersons who may have been infected or who care for those infected, argues an official in federal emergency management.
Political leaders and essential city workers are other priority groups.
A consensus must be reached as to how to proceed with the vaccinations.
CDC is best suited to coordinate vaccine efforts, but the public health community must work towards an emergency.
The governor, warns the city emergency manager, may step in and call the shots.
There is a need for a public health emergency plan.
Did the outbreak start from a single source or from multiple sources? This determination would help with vaccine management and allocation, but there is no answer.
Moreover, testing facilities at CDC and USAMRIID are overwhelmed at this point in the epidemic.
Hospitals must deal with quarantine.
Restrictions are imposed in the first days or weeks of an epidemic.
Workers fear of being Legal Ramifications According to a 1905 Massachusetts case, cites a states assistant attorney general, compulsory vaccinations are not a violation of due process and are therefore legal.
So the local, state, and federal levels of government have no obstacle to vaccinating those designated at risk.
A more difficult legal question is that of quarantining smallpox patients.
Many of the public health codes used to allocate powers to government officials are old and may not be valid or useful.
Also, court precedents from HIV cases may have heavily weighted matters in favor of due process.
Minnesota, for example, requires a separate court hearing for each case of quarantine.
Thus, quarantine may be possible in a hospital but not in the community.
Another basic legal question is whether the lines of legal support are clear to all officials, such as hospital guards and police officers.
How far can police go to detain quarantined patients? The limits of emergency powers should be clearly delineated in any predisaster planning.
The epidemic is threatening to expand beyond the city into the rest of the country and even beyond.
The World Health Organization (WHO) will probably become involved, and travel notifications have to be introduced.
Vaccine Supply Even without adequate supplies of vaccine, much can be done with the existing stocks.
Prevaccinating some health-care workers is a proactive approach.
Having a sizable pool of prevaccinated professionals who can mobilize and act as emergency responders takes much of the pressure off local hospitals.
One way to reduce secondary transmission (outside of vaccinating the contacts of the infected person), instructs the hospital epidemiologist, is good infection controlwearing filter masks and washing hands well.
Another way of controlling the epidemic is through quarantine.
While these measures are not a substitute for adequate vaccine supply, they can slow the epidemic.
Emerging Infectious Diseases 550 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue One problem with the vaccine supply is that many more people want to be vaccinated than limited stores permit.
There are not even enough stores of vaccine to prevent the spread of the epidemic.
The existing 6 to 7 million doses of smallpox vaccine will not last forever, and the 36 months it takes for additional large-scale preparations is prohibitive, argues a vaccine campaign expert.
Health officials will likely not have the time or resources to target precisely those people who have an actual need for vaccine.
The need for vaccine will overwhelm the supply.
The cost of vaccine development may inhibit stockpiling, proposes a CDC official.
Since an attack with smallpox is of low probability, largescale production may be difficult to justify.
A partnership between private industry and the government would help, however.
Also, the cost of getting caught without an adequate supply could be disastrous.
Possible emergency measures to stretch the vaccine supply, proposes a smallpox expert, include arm-to-arm vaccination as pustules form on the arms of vaccinated people; vaccinia could be grown in massive amounts in tissue culture; and 30 million doses of vaccine could be contracted from South Africa.
Failure of containment has turned the outbreak from local to national and international.
However, the epidemic would have been much worse, had it gone unchecked, notes a state health official.
Containment was significant.
The 15,000 smallpox cases could have easily been more than 100,000.
No perpetrators have yet been identified, despite combining the criminal and the epidemiologic investigations.
Such methodical work, however, is important because, unless the intelligence community comes up with information or a tip, there is no other way to identify the source of the epidemic, explains an FBI offical.
Many of the problems in the epidemic could have been avoided or controlled if extensive plans had existed, panelists agree.
The panelist speaking from a governors perspective identifies leadership as the most pressing void.
Should the city have been placed under immediate quarantine? Should martial law have been implemented? Is the designation of a single smallpox hospital a reasonable thing for any city to do? These are difficult questions to face in the wake of a disaster.
Such issues must be addressed long before trouble strikes.
Who Will Pay for the Smallpox Epidemic? The Final Stage The smallpox epidemic has become a major public health emergency affecting several cities in many states and at least four other countries.
The event is identified as a terrorist attack, because no other source of smallpox outside a deliberate release exists.
For those who have already contracted smallpox, antiviral drugs, such as cydolfivir, may be useful but these medicines may be just as scarce as the vaccines.
Secondary transmission got out of hand, vaccine use did not contain the epidemic, and standard planning did not work.
Thus a state health official sums up the deficiencies of response.
Hospital resources have been overwhelmed, with people flooding emergency rooms in the belief they have smallpox.
These cases are added to hospitalized cases before and during the epidemic; yet there are not even enough beds for all the sick.
The hospital staff have become physically and emotionally exhausted from the long hours and from seeing about a third of infected patients die.
The significant cost of curtailing the epidemic is debated.
How will a smallpox hospital be financed, inquires a physician.
The money might come from the federal government as emergency management funding, suggests a city emergency manager.
The infrastructure and linkages within the public health community could be improved, the capacity for laboratory testing of samples could be increased, surveillance methods could be enhanced, and a health information strategy could be developed.
While the smallpox scenario is certainly frightening, experience with earlier epidemics (smallpox among them), knowledge of the issues, and expertise to deal with them show that in a crisis people from all disciplines pull together.
Mr. Bardi is a freelance writer in Baltimore who holds degrees in biophysics and science writing from Johns Hopkins University.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 551 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Clinical and Epidemiologic Principles of Anthrax Theodore J. Cieslak and Edward M. Eitzen, Jr.
U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases, Ft. Detrick, Maryland, USA Background and Epidemiology Anthrax is one of the great infectious diseases of antiquity.
The fifth and sixth plagues in the Bibles book of Exodus (1) may have been outbreaks of anthrax in cattle and humans, respectively.
The Black Bane, a disease that swept through Europe in the 1600s causing large numbers of human and animal deaths, was likely anthrax.
In 1876, anthrax became the first disease to fulfill Kochs postulates (i.e., the first disease for which a microbial etiology was firmly established), and 5 years later, in 1881, the first bacterial disease for which immunization was available (2).
Large anthrax outbreaks in humans have occurred throughout the modern eramore than 6,000 (mostly cutaneous) cases occurred in Zimbabwe between October 1979 and March 1980 (3), and 25 cutaneous cases occurred in Paraguay in 1987 after the slaughter of a single infected cow (4).
Anthrax, in the minds of most military and counterterrorism planners, represents the single greatest biological warfare threat.
A World Health Organization report estimated that 3 days after the release of 50 kg of anthrax spores along a 2-km line upwind of a city of 500,000 population, 125,000 infections would occur, producing 95,000 deaths (5).
This number represents far more deaths than predicted in any other scenario of agent release.
Moreover, it has been estimated (6) that an aerial spray of anthrax along a 100-km line under ideal meteorologic conditions could produce 50% lethality rates as far as 160 km downwind.
Finally, the United States chose to include anthrax in the now-defunct offensive biological Address for correspondence: Theodore J. Cieslak, Operational Medicine Division, USAMRIID, 1425 Porter Street, Ft. Detrick, MD 21702, USA; fax: 301-619-2312, e-mail: Ted_Cieslak@Detrick.Army.Mil. weapons program of the 1950s, and the Soviet Union and Iraq also admitted to possessing anthrax weapons.
An accident at a Soviet military compound in Sverdlovsk in 1979 resulted in at least 66 deaths due to inhalational anthrax, an inadvertent demonstration of the viability of this weapon.
The epidemiology of this inadvertent release was unusual and unexpected.
None of the persons affected were children (7).
Whether this is due to differences in susceptibility between children and adults or purely to epidemiologic factors (children may not have been outdoors at the time of release) is unclear.
Anthrax is caused by infection with Bacillus anthracis, a gram-positive spore-forming rod.
The spore form of this organism can survive in the environment for many decades.
Certain environmental conditions appear to produce anthrax zones, areas wherein the soil is heavily contaminated with anthrax spores.
Such conditions include soil rich in organic matter (pH 
Partly because of its persistence in soil, anthrax is a rather important veterinary disease, especially of domestic herbivores.
In addition to encountering anthrax while grazing in areas of high soil contamination, these herbivores may also acquire the disease from the bite of certain flies (8).
Vultures may mechanically spread the organism in the environment (9).
Anthrax zones in the United States closely parallel the cattle drive trails of the 1800s (10).
Anthrax spores lend themselves well to aerosolization and resist environmental degradation.
Moreover, these spores, at 2-6 microns in diameter, are the ideal size for impinging on human lower respiratory mucosa, optimizing the chance for infection.
It is the manufacture and delivery of anthrax spores in this particular size Emerging Infectious Diseases 552 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue range (avoiding clumping in larger particles) that presents a substantial challenge to the terrorist attempting to use the agent as a weapon.
The milling process imparts a static charge to small anthrax particles, making them more difficult to work with and, perhaps, enabling them to bind to soil particles (11).
This, in part, may account for the relatively low secondary aerosolization potential of anthrax, as released spores bind to soil, now clumping in particles substantially in excess of 6 microns.
This clumping tendency, together with a high estimated ID50 of 8,000-10,000 spores may help explain the rarity of human anthrax in most of the Western world, even in areas of high soil contamination.
Other potential bioweapons, such as Q fever and tularemia, have ID50 values as low as 1 and 10 organisms, respectively.
in virulence.
These proteins are known as edema factor (EF), lethal factor (LF), and protective antigen (PA).
Following the A-B model of toxicity (13), PA serves as a necessary carrier molecule for EF and LF and permits penetration into cells.
Edema toxin results from the combination of EF + PA, lethal toxin results from the combination of LF + PA.
These toxins result in necrosis of the lymphatic tissue, which in turn causes the release of large numbers of B. anthracis.
The organisms gain access to the circulation, and an overwhelming fatal septicemia rapidly ensues.
At autopsy, widespread hemorrhage and necrosis involving multiple organs is seen.
Inhalational anthrax generally occurs after an incubation period of 1 to 6 days (14).
During the Sverdlovsk outbreak, however, spontaneous cases appeared to arise as late as 43 days after the assumed release date (7).
Such late cases are unexplained but have potentially serious implications for postexposure management of victims of aerosol exposure.
After the incubation period, a nonspecific flulike illness ensues, characterized by fever, myalgia, headache, a nonproductive cough, and mild chest discomfort.
A brief intervening period of improvement sometimes follows 1 to 3 days of these prodromal symptoms, but rapid deterioration follows; this second phase is marked by high fever, dyspnea, stridor, cyanosis, and shock.
In many cases, chest wall edema and hemorrhagic meningitis (present in up to 50% of cases [15]) may be seen late in the course of disease.
Chest radiographs may show pleural effusions and a widened mediastinum, although true pneumonitis is not typically present.
Blood smears in the later stages of illness may contain the characteristic gram-positive spore-forming bacilli.
Death is universal in untreated cases and may occur in as many as 95% of treated cases if therapy is begun more than 48 hours after the onset of symptoms.
While early recognition of anthrax is likely to require a heightened degree of suspicion, the diagnosis is supported by gram-positive bacilli in skin biopsy material (in the case of cutaneous disease) or in blood smears.
A preponderance of gram-positive bacilli in swabs of the nares or in appropriate environmental samples might support a diagnosis of anthrax where intentional release is suspected.
Chest radiographs exhibiting a widened mediastinum in the proper setting of fever and constitutional signs and in the absence of another obvious explanation (such as The Disease Most endemic anthrax cases are cutaneous and are contracted by close contact of abraded skin with products derived from infected herbivores, principally cattle, sheep, and goats.
Such products might include hides, hair, wool, bone, and meal.
Cutaneous anthrax is readily recognizable, presents a limited differential diagnosis, is amenable to therapy with any number of antibiotics, and is rarely fatal.
While common in parts of Asia and sub-Saharan Africa, cutaneous anthrax is very rare in the United States; the last case was reported in 1992 (12).
Inhalational anthrax, also known as woolsorters disease, has been an occupational hazard of slaughterhouse and textile workers; immunization of such workers has all but eliminated this hazard in Western nations.
As a weapon, however, anthrax would likely be delivered by aerosol and, consequently, be acquired by inhalation.
A third type of anthrax, acquired through the gastrointestinal route (e.g., consuming contaminated meat) is exceedingly rare but was initially offered by Soviet scientists as an explanation for the Sverdlovsk outbreak.
Inhalational anthrax begins after exposure to the necessary inoculum, with the uptake of spores by pulmonary macrophages.
These macrophages carry the spores to tracheobronchial or mediastinal lymph nodes.
Here, B. anthracis finds a favorable milieu for growth and is induced to vegetate.
The organism begins to produce an antiphagocytic capsule and at least three proteins, which appear to play a major role Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 553 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue blunt trauma, deceleration injury, or postsurgical infection) should also lead to a diagnosis of anthrax.
This finding is only likely to occur late in the course of disease.
Confirmation is obtained by culturing B. anthracis from blood.
was licensed (for preexposure prophylaxis) by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration in 1970 and is prepared from a formalin-treated culture supernatent of an avirulent B. anthracis strain.
It is given in a preexposure regimen at 0, 2, and 4 weeks, and at 6, 12, and 18 months.
Persons at continuing risk for exposure should receive yearly boosters.
Exposed persons should receive at least three doses (at 0, 2, and 4 weeks), assuming no further exposure is likely, before discontinuing chemoprohylaxis.
Recently, a number of hoaxes involving a threatened release of anthrax have been promulgated (19,20), and guidelines have now been published to assist in the management of such threats (19).
When evaluating a threatened release of anthrax, the lack of volatility of the disease, as well as its inability to penetrate intact skin, should be taken into account.
These factors make it unlikely, in most cases, that persons coming in contact with letters, packages, and other devices purported to contain anthrax will be at risk for aerosol exposure.
Moreover, because energy is required to aerosolize anthrax spores, opening a letter, even if it contained anthrax, would be unlikely to place a person at substantial risk.
For these reasons, postexposure prophylaxis may not be necessary in many cases of threatened anthrax dissemination.
Anthrax has little potential for person-toperson transmission; standard precautions are thus adequate for health-care workers treating anthrax patients.
Anthrax, as well as other bacteriologic and viral weapons, has an incubation period of 
This characteristic is not shared by conventional, chemical, and nuclear weapons and makes decontamination of infected persons admitted to hospitals days after exposure unnecessary in most cases.
However, in certain cases, such as exposure to a threat letter involving an unidentified substance, where anthrax cannot readily be ruled out by Gram stain or other rapid diagnostic procedures, decontamination may be warranted.
In such cases, decontamination may be accomplished by removing clothing, sealing it in a plastic bag, and showering with copious amounts of soap and water.
Environmental surfaces and personal effects may be treated with 0.5% hypochlorite after the area in which the agent was released is investigated (19).
In summary, even though anthrax may be among the most viable of biological weapons, it is Disease Management While endemic strains of B. anthracis are typically sensitive to various antibiotics, including penicillin G, antibiotic-resistant strains do (on rare occasion) occur naturally (16) and can be readily isolated in laboratories.
For this reason, as well as the convenience of twice-daily dosing, many experts consider ciprofloxacin (400 mg intravenously (i.v.) q 12 h) the drug of choice for treating victims of terrorism or warfare.
Doxycycline (100 mg i.v. q 12 h) is an acceptable alternative, although rare doxycycline-resistant strains of B. anthracis are known.
Conversely, however, the much lower cost of tetracyclines compared to quinolones may factor into therapeutic decisions, especially where large numbers of patients are involved.
These recommendations are based solely on in vitro data and data from animal models (17); no human clinical experience with these regimens exists.
In cases of endemic anthrax, or where organisms are known to be susceptible, penicillin G (2 million units i.v. q 2 h or 4 million units i.v. q 4 h) is recommended.
Postexposure prophylaxis against anthrax may be achieved with oral ciprofloxacin (500 mg orally q 12 h) or doxycycline (100 mg orally q 12 h), and all persons exposed to a bioterrorist incident involving anthrax should be administered one of these regimens at the earliest possible opportunity.
In cases of threatened or suspected release of anthrax, chemoprophylaxis can be delayed 24 to 48 hours, until the threat is verified.
Chemoprophylaxis can be discontinued if the threat is found to be false.
Levofloxacin and ofloxacin would be acceptable alternatives to ciprofloxacin.
In addition to receiving chemoprophylaxis, exposed persons should be immunized.
On the basis of animal data (wherein an appreciable number of unvaccinated primates died when antibiotics were withdrawn after 30 days of therapy) (18), chemoprophylaxis is best continued until the exposed persons has received at least three doses of vaccine (thus, for a minimum of 4 weeks).
If vaccine is unavailable, some recommend that chemoprophylaxis be continued for 8 weeks (19).
The available vaccine Emerging Infectious Diseases 554 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue also a weapon for which a licensed vaccine and good antimicrobial therapy and postexposure prophylaxis exist.
Given the relatively short incubation period, and rapid progression of disease, however, identification of the exposed population within 24 to 48 hours and employment of therapeutic and prophylactic strategies are likely to present a challenge.
Good intelligence regarding the capabilities of terrorist groups, as well as heightened awareness of the threat on the part of clinicians, first responders, and public health personnel remains a cornerstone of bioterrorism defense.
Dr. Cieslak is chief of Field Operations Department in the Division of Operational Medicine at the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases at Ft Detrick, MD. Dr. Cieslak is working in the area of medical defense against biological warfare and terrorism.
Dr. Eitzen is chief of the Division of Operational Medicine at the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases and adjunct associate professor of pediatrics and of military and emergency medicine at the Uniformed Services University of the Health Sciences in Bethesda, Maryland.
He has worked in the area of medical defense against biological warfare and terrorism for the past 8 years.
6.
7.
8.
9.
10.
11.
12.
13.
14.
15.
References 16.
1.
2.
Exodus 9:1-12.
Pasteur L, Chamberlain C-E, Roux E. Compte rendu sommaire des experiences faites a Pouilly-le-Fort, pres Melun, sur la vaccination charbonneuse [French].
Comptes Rendus des seances De LAcademie des Sciences 1881;92:1378-83.
Turner M. Anthrax in humans in Zimbabwe.
Cent Afr J Med 1980;26:160-1.
Harrison LH, Ezzell JW, Abshire TG, Kidd S, Kaufmann AF. Evaluation of serologic tests for diagnosis of anthrax after an outbreak of cutaneous anthrax in Paraguay.
J Infect Dis 1989;160:706-10.
Report of a WHO group of consultants.
Health aspects of chemical and biological weapons.
Geneva: World Health Organization; 1970.
p. 97-9.
17.
3.
4.
18.
19.
5.
20.
Science Applications International Corporation.
Effectiveness of medical intervention against battlefield levels of Bacillus anthracis.
1993.
Meselson M, Guillemin J, Hugh-Jones M, Langmuir A, Popova I, Shelokov A, Yampolskaya O, et al.
The Sverdlovsk anthrax outbreak of 1979.
Science 1994;266:1202-7.
Turell MJ, Knudson GB. Mechanical transmission of Bacillus anthracis by stable flies and mosquitoes.
Infect Immun 1987;55:1859-61.
Titball RW, Turnbull PCB, Hutson RA.
The monitoring and detection of Bacillus anthracis in the environment.
Journal of Applied Bacteriology 1991; Suppl 70:9S-18.
Coker PR, Smith KL, Hugh-Jones ME. Anthrax in the USA.
Proceedings of the Third International Conference on Anthrax, Plymouth, England, September 7-10, 1998:44 [abstract].
Sidell FR, Patrick WC, Dashiell TR, editors.
Janes chem-bio handbook.
Alexandria (VA): Janes Information Group; 1998.
p. 229-44.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
Summary of notifiable diseases, United States, 1997.
MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 1998;46:74.
Gill DM. Seven toxic peptides that cross cell membranes.
In: Jeljaszewicz J, Walstrom T, editors.
Bacterial toxins and cell membranes.
New York: Academic Press; 1978.
p. 291-332.
Brachman PS, Friedlander AM.
Anthrax.
In: Plotkin 
Vaccines.
Philadelphia (PA): W.B. Saunders; 1994.
p. 730.
Abramova FA, Grinberg LM, Yampolskaya OV, Walker DH. Pathology of inhalational anthrax in 42 cases from the Sverdlovsk outbreak of 1979.
Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1993;90:2291-4.
Lightfoot NF, Scott RJD, Turnbull PCB.
Antimicrobial susceptibility of Bacillus anthracis.
Salisbury Medical Bulletin Suppl 1990;68:95-8.
Kelly DJ, Chulay JD, Mikesell P, Friedlander AM.
Serum concentrations of penicillin, doxycycline, and ciprofloxacin during prolonged therapy in rhesus monkeys.
J Infect Dis 1992;166:1184-7.
Friedlander AM, Welkos SL, Pitt MLM, Ezzell JW, Worsham PL, Rose KJ, et al.
Postexposure prophylaxis against experimental inhalation anthrax.
J Infect Dis 1993;167:1239-42.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
Bioterrorism alleging use of anthrax and interim guidelines for management-United States, 1998.
MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 1999;48:69-74.
Sanchez R. California anthrax threats spawn costly wave of fear.
Washington Post, January 11, 1999, section A, page 1.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 555 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue Anthrax: A Possible Case History Thomas V. Inglesby Johns Hopkins School of Medicine, Baltimore, Maryland, USA Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) offices in five U.S. cities have received warnings of an imminent bioterrorist attack.
Each threat indicated that a shower of anthrax would rain on U.S. cities, unless certain demands were met immediately.
One of these calls was in Northeast, a large city on the Eastern Seaboard with a metropolitan population of 2 million.
The threats were credible, but no information was relayed to city officials in Northeast or elsewhere.
On the evening of November 1, a professional football game is being played in Northeasts outdoor stadium before an audience of 74,000.
The evening sky is overcast, the temperature mild, a breeze blows from west to east.
During the first quarter of the game, an unmarked truck drives along an elevated highway a mile upwind of the stadium.
As it passes the stadium, the truck releases an aerosol of powdered anthrax over 30 seconds, creating an invisible, odorless anthrax cloud more than a third of a mile in breadth.
The wind blows the cloud across the stadium parking lots, into and around the stadium, and onward for miles over the neighboring business and residential districts.
After the anthrax release, the truck continues driving and is more than 100 miles away from the city by the time the game is finished.
The anthrax release is detected by no one.
Approximately 16,000 of the 74,000 fans are infected by the anthrax cloud; another 4,000 in the business and residential districts downwind of the stadium also are infected.
After the game, the fans disperse to their homes in the greater Northeast metropolitan area; some return to homes in neighboring states.
A few are from other countries.
The driver of the truck and his associates leave the country by plane that night.
They will be many time zones away by the time the first symptoms of anthrax appear 2 days later.
A dd res s for c or resp ondenc e: T homa s V.
I ngle sby, Joh ns Hopk i n s C enter for C iv il ia n Bio defen se S tud ies , Ca nd ler Bu i ld i ng, Su ite 8 5 0 , 111 M a rket Pl., Ba lti more, M D 21 2 02 , USA; fa x: 410 -223 -1665; e-mail: tv i@ welchlin k.welch.jhu.edu.
Two days after the game, hundreds of people in and around Northeast become ill with fever, cough, and (in some cases) shortness of breath and chest pain.
Some of the sick self-administer over-the-counter cold remedies; some seek phone advice from physicians and nurses; others are seen in clinics, doctors offices, and emergency departments throughout the city.
Influenza cases had been seen in Northeast 2 weeks before the game.
Health-care providers seeing the new patients recommend bed rest and fluids for presumed flu.
Specimens are sent to confirm influenza.
A few of the sickest patients get chest radiographs to exclude pneumonia.
Only in retrospect, after the source of illness is clear, will the widened mediastinum seen on a number of chest radiographs be recognized for the signal it carries.
A few patients are hospitalized; some have blood cultures drawn.
The 400 ill persons in the region are receiving care from so many different sources that the health emergency is not detected.
By November 4, nurses and physicians note the increased volume of serious upper respiratory illness, and some contact the city health department for treatment recommendations and a regional flu update.
Blood cultures from the earliest patients grow gram-positive bacilli in seven laboratories around the city.
The laboratories identify these as Bacillus species.
No further identification is requested, and none is pursued.
By the evening of November 4, patients with the earliest symptoms are dying.
The illness has been rapidly fatal, killing previously healthy young adults within 24 to 48 hours.
Members of the medical community, now alarmed by these unexpected and unexplained deaths, urgently contact the state and city health departments.
Health department officials contact the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC).
By midnight November 4, 1,200 people around the city have fallen ill, 80 of whom have died.
Word that previously healthy persons are dying of a rapidly fatal illness spreads quickly among health-care providers in the state, and is Emerging Infectious Diseases 556 Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 Special Issue featured on local and national morning news shows.
News media interview families of the deceased, physicians, and city health officials.
Expert consultants appear on television to discuss potential diagnoses, including the new Spanish flu, Hong Kong bird flu, and many other infectious and noninfectious diseases.
A rapid survey of city emergency departments and health clinics finds that persons of all ages and from all sectors of the city continue to come down with similar illness.
The numbers have doubled since the previous day, inundating many healthcare facilities.
The mayor convenes an emergency meeting of leading medical experts and health officials as reporters gather outside city hall.
The assembled experts debate possible causes and responses to the illness.
Many express great concern that a virulent strain of influenza or another highly contagious disease may be present.
Isolation of all persons with fever, cough, or chest pain; expanded laboratory analyses; and rapid epidemiologic investigation are recommended.
Blood and tissue specimens are sent to CDC for urgent analysis.
CDC investigators are en route.
During a news conference, the mayor describes the citys response to what appears to be a serious influenza outbreak, appeals for public calm, and is surprised by questions about the possibility of bioterrorism.
By noon November 5, intensive-care units and isolation beds across the city are full.
Even patients receiving the most advanced medical care are dying.
Patients are febrile, hypotensive, and seem to be in septic shock; some have meningitis.
Still, there is no diagnosis.
At some locations, the shock of rapid and unexplained deaths has created an atmosphere of desperation and confusion among hospital and clinic staff.
The recommended isolation protocols quickly fall apart as hospital and clinic staffs struggle to cope with the surge of patients.
Fears of a contagious disease prompt hospital staff to don protective positive-pressure hoods; the news shows physicians working in this gear and explains that there are only two dozen or so such hoods available per hospital.
In the early evening of November 5, a university laboratory makes a preliminary diagnosis of anthrax from the blood culture of a young patient who died.
The laboratory immediately notifies city and state health departments, which in turn notify CDC and FBI.
The specimen is transferred to the U.S. Army Medical Research Institute of Infectious Diseases (USAMRIID), where within hours experts report that rapid diagnostic tests support the preliminary diagnosis of anthrax.
The mayor of Northeast consults with officials from the city and state health departments, CDC, FBI, and USAMRIID.
The working assumptions are that the disease in Northeast is anthrax and that it is the result of a bioterrorist attack.
Widespread exposure to an anthrax aerosol is feared.
The mayor is outraged to learn that the FBI had not informed her of the credible anthrax threat to Northeast.
She is also shocked that it has taken more than 80 deaths and hundreds of illnesses before anyone from the medical community came up with the diagnosis.
She is informed that an anthrax vaccine exists, but it is unclear whether any will be made available for civilian use in Northeast.
No one can yet estimate the probable scale of the epidemic or whether there has been a single or multiple attacks.
CDC is seeking news of similar syndromes in other locations around the country.
The mayors medical advisors recommend that quinolone antibiotics be used for initial treatment of the sick.
They also advise the same antibiotics for those exposed to anthrax but not yet sick, even though identifying the exposed will take time and requires more information.
All that is known is that many (but not all) of the dying had been at the football game on November 1.
The mayor also is told that to prevent death, antibiotics must be given before symptoms occur, or at the latest, in the earliest hours after symptoms begin.
Patients with serious symptoms are likely to die, no matter what anyone does.
Available information suggests that the local supply of needed antibiotics will soon be exhausted; many local pharmacies were already emptied of antibiotics as the initial news of a lethal epidemic spread through the city.
Given this shortage of antibiotics, one senior advisor asks the mayor to consider a triage plan that uses all available antibiotics to protect the exposed who are not yet sick.
In this plan, antibiotics would be kept from those already sick and thus likely to die, regardless of treatment.
The mayor requests immediate federal assistance in obtaining and distributing large supplies of antibiotics.
Antibiotic shipments from other states are also urgently requested.
Vol. 5, No. 4, JulyAugust 1999 557 Emerging Infectious Diseases Special Issue State officials notify hospitals around the city of the anthrax epidemic and warn them to prepare for a new surge of patients in the wake of the mayors forthcoming TV address.
Recommendations for the care of infected patients are sent to hospitals and c
